 Vlaar et al./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 
 *Experience is reflected in months. Experience ratios were calculated by dividing the average project experience of onsite team members by the
 average project experience of offshore staff. The ratio for module one, for instance, is calculated as follows: ((20+20)/2)/ ((8+2+8)/3) = 3.3. For
 module 1, the average experience of onsite team members with the project was 20 months, while the average experience of offshore team
 members was only 6 months. The ratio of onsite/offshore staff experience was therefore equal to 3.3.
 expectations (Cronin and Weingart 2007). In addition, incon
 gruent and inactionable understandings diminish managers'
 ability to shape the division of labor in such a way that it
 consists of "revenue-generating and organized actions" (Witt
 2000, p. 740). After all, labor can only be divided when
 parties have conceived, at least vaguely, which activities
 should be undertaken and what the results of those activities
 should be (Rathe and Witt 2001, p. 344). In brief, incon
 gruent understandings may diminish value creation by reducing the unity of intention and action (Baba et al. 2004).
 Because people frequently hold incomplete, different, and
 sometimes competing viewpoints on what is valuable and
 how value is created, it thus becomes necessary to recognize
 and reconcile incompatibilities in understandings (Cronin and
 Weingart 2007; Lepak et al. 2007). In our case study, we
 found that acts of sensegiving, sensedemanding, and sense
 breaking and socio-cognitive processes of sensemaking
 provided members of onsite and offshore vendor teams with
 

 Proposition 3: Acts of sensegiving, sense
 demanding, and sensebreaking increase the likeli
 hood that congruent and actionable understandings
 emerge among distributed workers.
 Cocreating Value: From Preexisting
 to Novel Understandings
 We propose that acts of sensegiving, sensedemanding, and
 sensebreaking not only augment value creation by dimin
 ishing problems of coordination and conflict, but also by
 helping onsite and offshore workers in conceiving what has
 to be developed and how this has to be done (Witt 2000). By
 engaging in these acts, team members may experience
 "imaginary moments" (Gergen etal. 2001, p. 697) from which
 new and valuable ideas emerge, enabling them to enhance the
 vendor's value proposition (also see Levina and Ross 2003).
 Specifically, ideas and opportunities for imagining and dis
 covering value generally reside in interactions where existing
 knowledge and perspectives conflux and where existing ac
 counts of reality are recombined. Value creation then rests on
 the ability of distant workers to bring together their perspec
 tives and experiences through social interactions, possibly
 changing how they define and think about concerns and situa
 tions (Baba et al. 2004; Hargadon and Bechky 2006). By
 having access to others' knowledge, experience, and perspec
 tives, group members can gain insights and "discover higher
 order themes, generalizations, and ideas" that go beyond any
 individual deductions (Weick and Roberts 1993, p. 358).
 Communicative acts allow them to explore the knowledge of
 different parties (Kang et al. 2007) and to actively reframe
 situations, problems, and possible solutions (Hargadon and
 Bechky, 2006). This may lead to new images, conceptions,
 or accounts of what to do, how to do it, and within which con
 straints (Witt 2000), possibly uncovering previously hidden
 or incompletely articulated opportunities for value creation
 (Gergen et al. 2001; Sandberg and Targama 2007).
 In the context of offshore ISD, this implies that onsite and off
 shore vendor team members not only engage in acts of sense
 giving, sensedemanding, and sensebreaking to communicate
 preexisting understandings (transferring or transforming the
 understandings held by members of one team), but also to
 cocreate novel accounts or conceptions of requirements and
 the processes by which software should be developed. These
 understandings are new for members of both teams and they
 enable them to see their world in a different light (Bechky
 2003, 2006; Gergen et al. 2001; Haragadon and Bechky
 2006). Following Hargadon and Bechky (2006), we therefore
 propose that members of distributed work teams deploy
 micro-level interactions of a transient nature to arrive at novel
 conceptions (Witt 1998) or accounts (Lawrence and Maitlis
 2007) of tasks, requirements, and the processes by which
 software has to be developed. As offshore relationships in
 creasingly include innovative and complex activities that
 require vendors to go beyond the plain execution of pre
 defined tasks (see Lewin and Peeters 2006), the socio
 cognitive acts constituting those interactions tend to become
 more significant (see Priem 2007). In this case, requirements
 and software development processes can no longer be con
 sidered as "given." Both parties have to complement acts of
 sensegiving and sensedemanding with instances of sense
 breaking so as to jointly conceive, imagine, and discover
 where value resides (Witt 1998, 2000). This entails a shift
 from communicating preexisting to cocreating novel under
 standings, as is captured in our final proposition (see also
 Figure 1).
 Proposition 4: The higher the relative incidence of
 acts of sensebreaking as compared to acts of sense
 giving and sensedemanding, the higher the likeli
 hood that members of distributed work teams co
 create novel understandings (new for both parties).
 Discussion ^^î^^HBH^^^^
 The objective of this study was to clarify how members of
 distributed teams develop advanced understandings. In line
 with a socio-cognitive perspective on communication and
 understanding (e.g., Cramton 2001; Damianand Chisan 2006;
 Davidson 2002; Gergen etal. 2001; Gibson and Earley 2007),
 we constructed a conceptual framework proposing that dis
 tributed workers engage in acts of sensegiving, sense
 demanding, and sensebreaking so as to arrive at more con
 gruent and actionable understandings. Our empirical study
 shows that knowledge and experience asymmetries and task
 and requirements characteristics?such as complexity, insta
 bility, ambiguity, and novelty?constitute important ante
 cedents of the interaction cycles in which these acts alternate.
 Furthermore, our empirical results indicate that distributed
 workers not only use acts of sensegiving, sensedemanding,
 and sensebreaking to prevent problems of understanding and
 transfer preexisting understandings, but also to cocreate novel
 understandings and to explore how value can be created in
 distributed work settings.
 244 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2/June 2008
This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
 Vlaar et al./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 Qjfteriy
 cocreating understanding and value in distributed
 Work: How Members of Onsite and Offshore
 Vendor Teams Give, Make, Demand,
 and Break Sense1
 By: Paul W. L. Vlaar
 Department of Management and Organization
 Vrije Universiteit Amsterdam
 De Boelelaan 1005
 1081 HV Amsterdam
 THE NETHERLANDS
 pvlaar@feweb.vu.nl
 Paul C. van Fenema
 Faculty of Military Sciences
 Netherlands Defense Academy
 P.O. Box 9002
 4800 PA Breda
 THE NETHERLANDS
 PC.v.Fenema@nlda.nl
 Vinay Tiwari
 Department of Decision and Information Sciences
 RSM Erasmus University
 P.O. Box 1738
 3000 DR Rotterdam
 THE NETHERLANDS
 vtiwari@rsm.nl
 ^his paper was recommended for acceptance by Associate Guest Editor
 Erran Carmel.
 Abstract
 Achieving shared, common, or mutual understandings among
 geographically dispersed workers is a central concern in the
 distributed work literature. Nonetheless, little is known yet
 about the socio-cognitive acts and communication processes
 involved with synchronizing and cocreating understandings
 in such settings. Building on a case study of a geographically
 distributed information systems development project at one of
 India's largestoffshore vendors, we postulate that knowledge
 and experience asymmetries, and requirements and task
 characteristics (such as complexity, instability, ambiguity,
 and novelty) prompt onsite and offshore team members to
 engage in acts of sensegiving, sensedemanding, and sense
 breaking. This allows them to make sense of their tasks and
 their environment, and it increases the likelihood that con
 gruent and actionable understandings emerge. Furthermore,
 it assists them in cocreating novel understandings, especially
 when acts of sensegiving and sensedemanding are comple
 mented with instances of sensebreaking. Our results
 contribute to the literature by explaining how distributed team
 members mitigate problems of understanding, transfer pre
 existing understandings, and cocreate novel understandings.
 Acts of sensegiving, sensedemanding, and sensebreaking
 allow distributed team members to jointly explore and
 generate value, thereby amplifying the performance of
 distributed workers.
 Keywords: Understanding, offshore, information systems
 development, ISD, social cognition, sensegiving, sense
 making, sensedemanding, sensebreaking, value creation
 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2, pp. 227-255/June 2008 111
This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
 Vlaar et al./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 Implications for Research
 This paper contributes to the literature on distributed work
 and offshore ISD by examining the cocreation of under
 standing and value by members of geographically dispersed
 teams. It nuances earlier recommendations to increase the
 frequency and intensity of communication (Herbsleb and
 Moitra 2001; Prikladnicki et al. 2003), or to engage in acts of
 help seeking (seeking assistance from others), help giving
 (devoting time and attention to assist others), and reflective
 reframing (attending and building on the comments and
 actions of others mindfully and respectfully). Positioning our
 study in a proliferating stream of literature on sensemaking,
 we suggest that acts of sensegiving, sensedemanding, and
 sensebreaking promulgate the development of different types
 of understanding. Our conceptualization of communication
 and understanding is not only applicable in situations where
 "help" is required. It extends to circumstances in which
 understandings are transferred, transformed, or cocreated.
 Moreover, it incorporates the notion of sensebreaking, which
 is shown to be fundamental to the cocreation of novel under
 standings, preventing team members from inappropriately
 exploiting existing knowledge and incrementally refining
 preexisting understandings (Kang et al. 2007). Finally, our
 conceptualization of communication and understanding may
 permit team members to recognize the existence and validity
 of differences in their understandings (Baba et al. 2004). We
 further advance that acts of sensegiving, sensedemanding, and
 sensebreaking may work as potential levers for diminishing
 problems of understanding (e.g., misinterpretation), trans
 ferring or transforming preexisting understandings, and co
 creating novel understandings. This prevents value dissipa
 tion, enhances the integration of contributions, and allows
 distributed workers to jointly explore and exploit oppor
 tunities for value creation.
 This paper contributes to the literature on offshore ISD by
 focusing on micro-level interactions between onsite and
 offshore vendor teams. In doing so, it not only answers calls
 for more empirical research on communication and under
 standing in distributed work settings in general (Cullen et al.
 2005; Hinds and Mortensen 2005; Kellogg et al. 2006;
 Majchrzak et al. 2005), and for globally distributed offshore
 outsourcing projects in particular (Damian and Chisan 2006;
 Rottman and Lacity 2004, 2006). It also complements
 existing perspectives on the evolution of understanding in
 such settings. Prior research emphasizes that understandings
 develop or converge through various cycles or stages
 (Cramton 2001; Cronin and Weingart 2007; Gibson 2001;
 Gibson and Early 2007; Kellogg et al. 2006). Our research,
 instead, suggests that communication may largely have an ad
 hoc character. Moreover, it indicates that achieving more
 advanced understandings depends not only on the existence
 of perceived asymmetries in knowledge and experience, and
 the prevalence of particular task and requirements charac
 teristics, but also on individual abilities and opportunities to
 engage in acts of sensegiving, sensedemanding, and sense
 breaking (Hargadon and Bechky 2006; Maitlis and Lawrence
 2007).
 The paper further contributes to the debate on the question of
 whether individuals or collectives constitute the primary
 source of new value creation. Empirical studies that dis
 entangle these effects are lacking (Felin and Hesterly 2007).
 In this paper, we connect perspectives oriented toward the
 individual and the collective by emphasizing the significance
 of asymmetries in knowledge and experience among team
 members, while also pointing at the importance of social
 interaction for advancing understanding and creating value.
 We argue that individual and social aspects of value creation
 are interrelated, as asymmetries on the individual level give
 rise to socio-cognitive acts at the collective level. This
 renders the question of where the most heterogeneity lies, be
 it on the individual or the collective level (Felin and Hesterly
 2007, p. 201), somewhat less appropriate. It suggests,
 instead, the need to tease out the connection between
 individual and social aspects of value creation. This could be
 done, for instance, by focusing on the relationship between
 individual conditions (e.g., knowledge and experience asym
 metries) , individual processes (e.g., reasoning, analyzing, and
 imagining), social conditions (e.g., structure, technology, and
 norms), and processes (e.g., acts of sensegiving, sense
 demanding, and sensebreaking).
 Implications for Practice
 Congruent and actionable understandings increase the
 likelihood that work accomplished by offshore teams coin
 cides with the expectations held by onsite team members and
 client representatives. Achieving such understandings, there
 fore, involves the generation of?sometimes considerable?
 value. To advance understandings, practitioners have to pro
 mote acts of sensegiving, sensedemanding, and sensebreaking
 (i.e., iterative cycles of communication) among distributed
 workers. We suggest that they can do so by establishing
 favorable organizational, individual, and technological condi
 tions and by influencing opportunities for synchronous
 communication. First, on the organizational level, managers
 could create a climate that allows for reflective reframing.
 This enables people to suspend their judgments, call each
 other's beliefs and values into question (Baba et al. 2004), and
 build on the comments and actions of others in a mindful and
 respectful manner (Ashford et al. 2003; Hargadon and Bechky
 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2/June 2008 245
This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
 Vlaar et a/./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 Introduction ^ MHI^HHM
 Globally distributed work is burgeoning (Gibson and Cohen
 2003; Griffith et al. 2003; Hinds and Kiesler 2002; Majchrzak
 et al. 2004), due in part to the increasing availability of
 competitive resource pools across the world (Cairncross 2001) and the continuous introduction of advanced collaboration
 technologies (Malhotra and Majchrzak 2005). Examples of
 distributed work arrangements include international research
 and development projects and global software development
 teams (Carmel 1999; Hinds and Kiesler 2002). A common
 theme across the distributed work literature concerns the
 influence of geographical dispersion and technology media
 tion on the development of shared, common, or mutual under
 standings (e.g., Carmel and Tjia 2005; Cramton 2001, 2002;
 Hinds and Bailey 2003; Hinds and Mortensen 2005; Jarven
 paa and Leidner 1999; Davis et al. 2004; Majchrzak et al.
 2005; Maznevski and Chudoba 2000; Montoya-Weiss et al.
 2001; Polzeretal. 2006).
 Concerns related to the development of advanced under
 standings tend to be particularly pronounced during initial
 stages of collaboration as members working from different
 locations tend to hold different accounts (see Lawrence and
 Maitlis 2007) or conceptions of reality (see Witt 1998, 2000).
 These differences may not only cause challenges of
 understanding, such as distrust, conflict, and misinterpretation
 (Cronin and Weingart 2007; Vlaar et al. 2006), but they may
 also complicate the transfer and transformation of preexisting
 understandings and the cocreation of novel understandings
 (see Baba et al. 2004; Bechky 2006; Gergen et al. 2001;
 Hargadon and Bechky 2006). This may ultimately restrict
 opportunities for innovation and value creation (Lepak et al.
 2007; Sandberg and Targama 2007; Witt 1998, 2000).
 Although the literature on distributed work recognizes the
 origins of such challenges?for example, contextual dif
 ferences, task characteristics, and failures in communication
 (Cramton 2001; Hinds and Mortensen 2005; Maznevski and
 Chudoba 2000)?it remains relatively silent on the socio
 cognitive acts and communication processes used to advance
 understandings (for notable exceptions, see Ahuja and Galvin 2003; Cramton 2001; Davidson 2002; Galliers and Swan
 2000; Gibson and Earley 2007; Hargadon and Bechky 2006).
 In response to these observations and calls from several
 scholars (e.g., Cullen et al. 2005; Hinds and Mortensen 2005;
 Kellogg et al. 2006; Majchrzak et al. 2005), we therefore
 explore the following research question: Which socio
 cognitive acts and communication processes do members of
 distributed work teams use to advance their understandings?
 To investigate this question, we adopt a socio-cognitive
 perspective on distributed work, presuming that individuals
 construct their understanding in conjunction with others (i.e.
 they are socially constructed; for examples, see Cramton
 2001; Damian and Chisan 2006; Davidson 2002; Gergen et al.
 2001; Gibson and Earley 2007). To substantiate our
 argument, we conduct a case study of an offshore information
 systems development project at one of India's largest
 outsourcing vendors. We opt for offshore ISD outsourcing,
 which refers to the subcontracting of an activity by a client
 organization to an independent service provider working from
 an overseas destination (Carmel and Agarwal 2002; Lewin
 and Peeters 2006), because it comprises a form of distributed
 work that has witnessed considerable growth during the last
 decades. Organizations are increasingly compelled to off
 shore work to countries such as India, China, Russia, and the
 Philippines (see Carmel and Agarwal 2002; King 2006;
 Rottman and Lacity 2006), due to competitive pressures that
 force them to focus on their core activities, reduce costs, and
 improve responsiveness (Kern et al. 2002). This development
 is reinforced by the growing sophistication of data and com
 munication technologies and differences in the availability of
 skilled IT professionals and comparative costs of ISD work
 across the world.
 In the spring of 2006, we solicited data and perceptions from 18 members of onsite and offshore teams located in New
 Jersey (i.e., the client site) and Bangalore, India, respectively.
 Our analysis of their rich and in-depth accounts of commu
 nication practices used in four distinct ISD modules resulted
 in a conceptual framework that depicts the development of
 understanding as an iterative sequence of socio-cognitive acts
 and processes. This sequence consists of sensemaking, sense
 giving, sensedemanding, and sensebreaking (see Figure 1).
 Consistent with prior research (e.g., Bhat et al. 2006; Kijkuit
 and Van den Ende 2007; Ko et al. 2005; Lin et al. 2005;
 Ramirez et al. 2002), we postulate that knowledge and experi
 ence asymmetries and complex, novel, ambiguous, and un
 stable requirements and tasks prompt onsite and offshore
 vendor team members to engage in acts of sensegiving, sense
 demanding, and sensebreaking. We further propose that these
 acts increase the likelihood that congruent and actionable
 understandings emerge. Finally, we advance the concept that
 team members' engagement in iterative communication cycles
 not only diminishes problems of understanding (e.g., Cronin
 and Weingart 2007; Vlaar et al. 2006), but we also contend
 that it enables the transfer of preexisting understandings and
 the cocreation of novel understandings (see also Bechky
 2006; Gergen et al. 2001; Hargadon and Bechky 2006),
 particularly when acts of sensegiving and sensedemanding are
 complemented with instances of sensebreaking.
 228 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2/June 2008
This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
 Vlaar et al./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 2006; Gergen et al. 2001). Likewise, institutionalization of
 norms of communication among stakeholders (Ahuja and
 Galvin 2003; Chudoba et al. 2006; Gibson and Earley 2007;
 Sarker and Sahay 2004) and the adoption of an ethno
 relativistic attitude?implying that people take the perspective
 of the other team and attempt to understand the world through
 someone else's eyes?have to be encouraged (Cramton and
 Hinds 2005). Creating such a climate requires minimizing
 hierarchical and status barriers between distributed work
 teams (Ahuja and Galvin 2003; Ashford et al. 2003; Cramton
 and Hinds 2005; Metiu 2006), so that members become more
 inclined to communicate across levels and specializations.
 Second, on the individual level, training and education pro
 grams for IT specialists could pay more attention to communi
 cation and other so-called soft skills that help them to better
 anticipate and assess when and how to effectively give,
 demand, and break sense. Such skills still receive limited
 attention in the curricula of global IS education programs
 (King 2005; Prikladnicki et al. 2003). In conjunction with
 technical and business expertise, these training programs
 should therefore focus their attention on increasing the sen
 sitivity of distributed workers in recognizing possible dif
 ferences between their own and others' understandings, and
 on effectuating changes in others' understandings. In order to
 further enhance future IT specialists' abilities to engage in
 remote communications, training programs could also stress
 the development of skills and traits related to eloquence,
 patience, credibility, and the capacity for gaining sympathy
 and confidence (Gergen et al. 2001; Witt 1998, 2000).
 Third, with respect to technological conditions, our findings
 suggest that some methods, collaborative tools, and technical
 solutions may be more useful than others. This depends,
 among other variables, on the extent to which they inhibit or
 stimulate processes of sensemaking, and drive or hamper acts
 of sensegiving, sensedemanding, and sensebreaking (Boland
 and Tenkasi 1995). For example, virtual prototypes can save
 costs and time (Sutcliffe et al. 2005), while also stimulating
 sensegiving and sensemaking. Moreover, instant messaging
 is a tool that incorporates quick feedback, thereby increasing
 the likelihood that double-interacts arise during communi
 cation. Likewise, computer-based interviewing could help in
 eliciting information from clients (i.e., sensedemanding), but
 it may also enhance interpersonal communication between
 onsite and offshore teams afterward, as the information that
 is being transmitted among stakeholders is likely to become
 less equivocal in nature (Hands et al. 2005). In addition,
 practitioners may use tools that help to identify differences in
 interpretation and evaluation by stakeholders during require
 ments development (see Kaiya et al. 2005). When organiza
 tional, individual, and technological conditions promote
 sensegiving, sensedemanding, and sensebreaking, vendor
 team members probably engage in more complex, advanced,
 and possibly more valuable communication patterns. In this
 case, the organizations in which they are active may develop
 distributed organizing competencies (Orlikowski 2002),
 which increase their ability to realize the potential value
 inherent in offshore relationships, and which allow them to
 explore and exploit practices that add more value (Lewin and
 Peeters2006).
 Finally, organizations may influence the availability of oppor
 tunities for synchronous communication. They can expand
 the overlap of temporal collaboration windows, for example,
 through working longer, shifting working hours, and
 increasing worker availability (Espinosa and Carmel 2003).
 Another option is to vary the location of resources in order to
 reduce time separation between clients, onsite teams, and
 offshore teams. In practice, Indian firms have been expanding
 their global presence already in response to threats posed by
 the rising prominence of "nearshore," or proximate, foreign
 locations. Some firms now provide their clients with a loca
 tional menu of choices. TCS, for instance, offers its British
 clients services from farshore (India), nearshore (Budapest,
 Hungary), and onshore (London and Nottingham) (Carmel
 and Abbott 2006). Other vendors have opened facilities in
 countries such as Mexico and Portugal to combine proximity
 to customer sites with low costs and 24 x 7 service delivery.
 Our research indicates that clients' choices between (networks
 of) locations should be contingent upon the challenges they
 anticipate when trying to achieve congruent and actionable
 understandings during requirements development.
 Limitations and Future Research
 As with any study, several limitations apply. First, our
 primary data consist of reflective interviews and surveys. An
 ideal research design, however, would include an event-based
 study and participant observations during requirements
 sharing instances. However, such research designs are hard
 to implement, because offshore projects generally involve
 security protocols and nondisclosure agreements prohibiting
 vendors from sharing behavioral data with third parties.
 Second, data was derived from only one project and one
 vendor company, reducing the generalizability of our results.
 We used a replication logic (Eisenhardt 1989; Yin 2002), by
 including instances of requirements sharing from four
 different project modules to neutralize this problem and
 enhance the analytical generalizability of our findings. Third,
 we did not integrate several concerns that are known to
 restrict communications among distributed work teams in our
 research framework, such as differences in status and dif
 246 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2/June 2008
 This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
 Vlaar et al./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 Antecedents: Socio-Cognitive Acts and Processes: Understanding:
 ( Asymmetry in knowledge and ] / ( ~ \ ~ ^| \ f Congruence and actionability ] experience of team members / J Sensemaking by offshore : \ of understandings \ / >^l team members ^S. \ Focal project ^ ^ / yr >w \ ? " Understandings held by IT offshoring y_<(/__ __^_\" different members have the Client's business /y N. y^ \ \ same behavioral implications Technology and programming // Sensegiving by onsite \ / Sensegiving by offshore \\ or lead up to the same I language ) / \ ' Translate/standard language Translate/standard language \ V outcomes. J ^--y/ Explain & offer background Explain & offer background \ ^-^ / Confirm view Confirm view \ / Use analogy/metaphor Use analogy/metaphor \
 / Sensedemanding by onsite Sensedemanding by offshore \ y Request confirmation Request confirmation \ / Ask for clarification Ask for clarification \ ( Demand information Demand information y
 \ Sensebreaking by onsite Sensebreaking by offshore / \ Offer contradictory Offer contradictory y \ evidence evidence / \ Give very negative Give very negative / \ evaluation evaluation / \ Provide overall picture Provide overall picture / y "N y-\ \ Present alternative view Present alternative view / ( Preexisting and novel j f Requirements and task | \\ Question assumptions J \ Question assumptions J y understandings characteristics V^-_' ^-7_' y P2 \ *C / / P4 " Understandings that are held Complexity -P\ N^ _ / A- by members of one team (but Nnupltv \ >w ( I " ^ >^ / not by members of the other Acuity \ N Se"^r^Sir,,e K / team) as opposed to I . Instability J \ I_reammemoers_j / understandings that are new | \_/ \_/ I for both teams. J
 Figure 1. Conceptual Framework: Developing Congruent and Actionable Understandings in Distributed Work Settings
 Our study contributes to the literature on distributed work by
 examining how geographically distributed team members
 cocreate understandings and value. While researchers have
 acknowledged that it is sometimes "hard to do work across
 dispersed groups" (Metiu 2006, p. 418), we highlight some of
 the acts that are used to alleviate problems of understanding,
 accomplish complex tasks, and create value in such settings.
 The latter becomes more significant as distributed work
 increasingly involves innovative projects that are global in
 scope and conducive to business growth instead of quick
 palliatives to reduce cost (see Herbsleb and Moitra 2001;
 Lewin and Peeters 2006; Rottman and Lacity 2006). In 2005,
 ABN AMRO bank, for example, entered into an offshore
 outsourcing agreement with Accenture, IBM, Infosys Tech
 nologies, Patni Computer Systems, and Tata Consultancy Services worth over U.S. $2 billion, for which ISD activities
 needed to be distributed throughout Europe, Latin America,
 and India (McDougall 2005). Such initiatives entail complex
 and innovative tasks, which aggravate challenges of under
 standing and increase the need to jointly explore how value can best be created.
 This paper contributes to the literature on offshore ISD by
 focusing on the nature of micro-level interactions between vendor teams and by delineating its outcomes (Cannon
 Bowers and Salas 2001) in terms of different types of under
 standings. It moves beyond treating communication as a
 monolithic concept (Ahuja and Galvin 2003) by highlighting
 the socio-cognitive acts of communication used to alleviate
 problems of understanding, transfer preexisting under
 standings, and cocreate novel understandings. Focusing on
 intra-vendor teams, our results complement prior research on
 offshore ISD examining strategic or macro level issues from
 a client perspective (e.g., Carmel and Agarwal 2001; Feeny et
 al. 2005). Through exploring the acts used by vendor team
 members to meaningfully interrelate their understandings, the
 paper builds on and extends earlier work stressing the need
 for frequent and intense communication (Herbsleb and Moitra
 2001; Prikladnicki et al. 2003), temporal coordination mech
 anisms (Hinds and Bailey 2003; Maznevski and Chudoba
 2000; Montoya-Weiss et al. 2001), sophisticated communica
 tion tools (Cramton 2001; Sinha et al. 2006), comprehensive
 requirements documents (Hull et al. 2005; Wiegers 2006), and an effective division and structure of work in distributed ISD
 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2/June 2008 229
This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
 Vlaar et al./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 ferences in interests and objectives amongst team members
 (Cramton and Hinds 2005; Levina and Vaast 2005; Metiu
 2006). We refrained from incorporating these and other
 aspects as moderators in our framework because we aimed to
 clarify the relationship between communication and under
 standing. However, we recognize that organizational,
 individual, and technological conditions have to be kept in
 mind when considering the framework.
 A first opportunity for future research resides in distin
 guishing between understandings of the content of tasks and
 requirements and understanding the contextfrom which they
 originate and to which they apply. Failures to exchange
 adequate information about the contexts of task represent a
 significant challenge in distributed work (Sole and Edmond
 son 2002). Consequently, team members are "likely to work
 from different definitions of the situation, which handicaps
 communication and collaboration" (Cramton 2001, p. 362).
 Moreover, unshared contexts limit opportunities for direct
 observation, co-orientation on artifacts and boundary objects,
 and synchronization of activities around shared temporal
 rhythms (Baba et al. 2004; Levina and Vaast 2003; Maz
 nevski and Chudoba 2000; Montoya-Weiss et al. 2001).
 Instead, workers depend to a large extent on documents, from
 which they construct literal, "face-value" understandings,
 implying that they interpret the "cold, dead numbers" and
 symbols (Boland 1991, p. 453). However, stakeholders also
 need to understand the context in which requirements are
 developed so as to arrive at a "warm" and "subjective" reality
 (Boland 1991, p. 453. This is crucial, since situational oppor
 tunities and constraints may shape the needs of stakeholders
 (Johns 2006), and the meaning of words, texts, and their
 salience "depend [s] upon the situation, context and com
 munity in which people are expressing themselves" (Bechky
 2003, p. 313; see also Cramton 2001; Kellogg et al. 2006;
 Ngwenyama and Lee 1997). Researchers could therefore
 investigate the socio-cognitive acts that favor the development
 of understandings of the content of tasks and requirements
 and those acts that primarily support the development of
 understandings regarding the contexts in which they feature.
 A second avenue for future research concerns the artifacts that
 are being used to advance understandings in distributed work
 settings (Bechky 2003; Boland and Tenkasi 1995; Malhotra
 et al. 2001). Researchers have argued, for example, that
 drafting formal documents may help partners in collaborative
 relationships to develop joint understandings. This occurs,
 among other reasons, because such processes enable partici
 pants to focus their attention, provoke them to deliberate and
 reflect, and diminish the incompleteness and inconsistency of
 their cognitive representations (Vlaar et al. 2006). Others
 have hinted at the idea that objects, models and maps (Carlile
 2004), as well as drawings and prototypes (Bechky 2003;
 Levina and Vaast 2005) may prove to be valuable boundary
 objects that assist members of distributed work teams in
 giving, making, demanding, and breaking sense. Such arti
 facts may, for example, help to elicit feedback from others
 and create common ground (Bechky 2003), as they focus the
 attention of various working teams on the same issues, while
 narrowing down opportunities for misinterpretation and
 overly broad discussions. Future research could asses the role
 of such boundary objects in developing congruent and
 actionable understandings.
 Third, researchers may investigate how application of the
 socio-cognitive processes and communicative acts that we
 have investigated varies for different cultures. Krishna et al.
 (2004, p. 64) refer to the example of British managers in an
 outsourcing relationship with an Indian software supplier,
 who found that Indian programmers would not voice criticism
 in face-to-face meetings but would sometimes send their
 opinions in e-mail messages after the meeting had disbanded.
 The British managers, "who were used to intense interaction
 and the development of ideas through meetings, felt frustrated
 at this polite behavior" (Krishna et al. 2004, p. 65). An
 interviewee in another study mentioned that, "What you say
 and mean in India and in another country could be entirely
 different. I think it requires a lot of work...to ensure the
 matching of minds" (Oza and Hall 2005, p. 33). These
 examples indicate that members from different cultural back
 grounds may exhibit distinct preferences for social interaction
 norms, which may hamper communication (Baba et al. 2004;
 Maznevski and Chudoba 2000). Other examples show that
 cultural differences may both prohibit and facilitate learning
 across teams. This is proposed to vary with the extent to
 which members adopt an attitude of mutual positive distinc
 tiveness, perceived interdependence, and social and institu
 tional supports for interaction (Cramton and Hinds 2005).
 Future research could build on this work to assess how
 cultural differences shape the communicative acts used by
 distributed workers.
 A fourth opportunity for future research builds on the notion
 that it is difficult for distributed team members to assess what
 others know, and which information they need (Faraj and
 Sproull 2000; Metiu 2006; Sole and Edmondson 2002).
 These people face a communication dilemma in ascertaining
 when and whether to give, demand, and break sense, and what
 to communicate to others. Moreover, they may sometimes
 falsely assume that the other "speaks and understands on the
 basis of [the] same information and interpretation" (Cramton
 2001, p. 347). Our study indicates that regular dialogues
 aimed at achieving "mutual adjustment" (Maznevski and
 Chudoba 2000) and "double interacts" (Weick 1969)?
 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2/June 2008 247
This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
 Vlaar et al./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 projects (Carmel and Agarwal 2001; Malhotra et al. 2001). In
 particular, it suggests that these recommendations should be
 regarded in light of their relationship with acts of sensegiving,
 sensedemanding and sensebreaking.
 In building our argument, we first review the literature on
 distributed work and offshore ISD, focusing on the concepts
 central to this study: understanding and communication.
 Subsequently, we present and analyze a revelatory case study
 concerning a distributed vendor team, which then serves as a
 basis for our conceptual framework and several tentative
 propositions. In the discussion section, we explore the theo
 retical and practical implications of our findings. The paper
 concludes with limitations and avenues for future research.
 Conceptual Foundations ^^ ^^H
 Distributed Work
 Distributed work involves collaboration among teams across
 "locational, temporal and relational boundaries to accomplish
 an interdependent task" (Martins et al. 2004, p. 808). It is
 characterized by geographic dispersion, reliance on electronic
 media, and national diversity (Carmel 1999; Griffith et al.
 2003), which form "a centrifugal force that propels team
 members apart from each other," causing breakdowns in com
 munication, coordination, control, and cohesion (Carmel and
 Tjia 2005, p. 151). Scholars have alluded to the role of com
 munication in distributed work settings as it affects, among
 others, collaboration (Majchrzak et al. 2005; Sarkar and
 Sahay 2003), trust (Jarvenpaa and Liedner 1999), conflict
 (Hinds and Bailey 2003; Hinds and Mortensen 2005), and
 team dynamics (Cramton and Hinds 2005; Metiu 2006).
 Specifically, members in distributed work settings encounter
 challenges related to information exchange and process trans
 parency (Cramton and Orvis 2003); isolation, detachment,
 identity and status (Ahuja and Galvin 2003; Kirkman et al.
 2002; Metiu 2006; Polzer et al. 2006); attribution and inter
 pretation (Armstrong and Cole 2002; Sole and Edmondson
 2002); and the development of mutual, common, or shared
 understandings (Cramton 2001; Postrel 2002).
 Large geographic distances and differences in culture, back
 ground, and experience among team members complicate
 communication and understanding in remote collaborations
 (Carmel 1999; Cramton and Hinds 2005; Damian and Chisan
 2006; Metiu 2006; Sinha et al. 2006). Cramton and Hinds
 (2005, p. 236), for example, argue that differences in demo
 graphic attributes and individual backgrounds may result in
 people having different worldviews, values, beliefs,
 goal priorities and behavioral norms, and being
 accorded different amounts of power and status.
 This leads them to define situations differently, see
 issues differently.
 Moreover, as distributed workers are situated in distinct
 locations, they will "experience different exogenous events,
 physical settings, constraints and practices, resulting in their
 having different information, assumptions, preferences and
 constraints" (Cramton and Hinds 2005, p. 236).
 Issues of understanding and communication may further be
 aggravated by members' dependence on technology mediated
 communication, which reduces communication richness,
 closeness of teams, the immediacy of feedback, and the extent
 and rate of information transfer (Carlson and Zmud 1999;
 Carmel 1999; Gibson and Gibbs 2006; Metiu 2006). More
 over, communication across distance frequently entails
 failures to communicate and retain contextual information,
 uneven distribution of information, differences in the per
 ceived salience of and speed with which information can be
 accessed, and ambiguities regarding the interpretation of
 silence (Cramton 2001). Furthermore, it generally involves
 diminished opportunities for face-to-face, synchronous,
 informal, and spontaneous communication (Carmel and Tjia
 2005; Herbsleb and Mockus 2003; Maznevski and Chudoba
 2000). In particular, challenges of understanding and com
 munication are more salient in geographically distributed
 teams than in collocated teams due to the absence of shared
 context (Hinds and Bailey 2003; Kiesler and Cummings
 2002) and team members' lack of awareness of distant knowl
 edge (Sole and Edmondson 2002). In contrast to collocated
 teams, distributed team members can rely less on visual
 inspection and observation, demonstration of problems, non
 verbal expressions (e.g., facial or body movements) expres
 sions, and ongoing or spontaneous conversations (Bechky
 2003; Cramton and Orvis 2003; Montoya-Weiss et al. 2001).
 This may cause issues to go unrecognized or lie unresolved
 for prolonged periods of time (Herbsleb and Moitra 2001),
 and it requires members of distributed teams to spend
 considerable time on reviewing, clarifying, and resolving the
 meaning of issues resulting in delays and costly communi
 cation processes (Rottman and Lacity 2006; Wiegers 2006).
 Offshore ISD and Requirements Development
 Offshore ISD represents a particular form of distributed work,
 which has characteristics that inhibit communication and
 development of understandings among team members beyond
 the ones already discussed. First, offshore ISD involves an
 230 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2/June 2008
 This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
 Vlaar et al./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 referring to actions and reactions that provide the originator
 of action with feedback?are crucial to remote communica
 tion. They enhance the chances that individuals develop more
 "conjoint realities" (Tsoukas 2005) and therefore deserve
 further inquiry.
 A fifth opportunity for further research concerns the links
 between each of the socio-cognitive acts that we have
 identified and the coordination processes by which they are
 followed. In this paper, we have focused on the socio-cogni
 tive acts that distributed workers use to create advanced
 understandings, and which are therefore underlying any
 attempt at value creation (Sandberg and Targama 2007; Witt
 1998, 2000). After such understandings have been estab
 lished, more familiar management processes, such as struc
 turing, bundling, and leveraging of resources may be
 deployed in order to actually realize the value that potentially
 can be created (Sirmon et al. 2007). Future research could
 address, for example, how implicit coordination (i.e., action
 based on expectations, understandings, anticipation, and
 predictions) and explicit coordination and management
 processes interrelate (Rico et al. 2008; Sandberg and Targama
 2007). Do congruent and actionable understandings, for
 example, substitute or complement formal coordination?
 And, to what extent do early decisions regarding coordination
 affect whether novel understandings can be cocreated?
 Finally, researchers could examine the structural, affective,
 and cognitive dimensions of social relations among members
 of distributed work teams (Kang et al. 2007), and they could
 assess how variation along these dimensions influences the
 likelihood that members achieve congruent and actionable
 understandings and that they cocreate novel understandings.
 Does the use of common systems and standardized languages,
 for instance, propel the creation of congruent and actionable
 understandings? And, is it more favorable for the communi
 cation of preexisting understandings, or does it also help
 distributed workers in cocreating novel understandings?
 Moreover, researchers could examine how the type of
 language that is being used in these interactions shapes the
 understandings that are being created (see Gergen et al. 2001).
 After all, language is arguably "one of the most basic and
 critical, but also creative, acts of human beings, providing a
 'window to the mind'" (Felin and Hesterly 2007, p. 202).
 One could assess which elements of language are primarily
 used for sensebreaking, for example, and which ones are more
 conducive to acts of sensegiving and sensedemanding.
 Conclusion i^H^îHBIIHH^^H^^H
 In this paper, we have investigated the socio-cognitive acts
 and communication processes that members of distributed
 work teams use to advance their understandings. Building on
 a case study involving one of India's largest offshore out
 sourcing vendors, we show that knowledge and experience
 asymmetries, and requirements and task characteristics?such
 as complexity, instability, ambiguity, and novelty?prompt
 members of onsite and offshore vendor teams to engage in
 acts of sensegiving, sensedemanding, and sensebreaking.
 These acts allow them to make sense of tasks, requirements
 and their situation in general, thereby increasing the likeli
 hood that members of different teams achieve congruent and
 actionable understandings. Moreover, these acts not only
 assist distributed workers in coping with problems of under
 standing and transferring preexisting understandings, but they
 also enable them to cocreate novel understandings. Our
 findings shed new light on the cocreation of understanding
 and value in globally distributed work and offshore ISD in
 particular.
 Acknowledgments
 All authors have contributed equally to this paper. This research has
 benefited from inspiring discussions with and feedback from Africa
 Arino, Peter van Baalen, Tom Elfring, Eric van Heck, Nicolaj Foss,
 Justin Jansen, Rosalinde Klein Woolthuis, Otto Koppius, Kuldeep
 Kumar, Sally Maitlis, Peter Smith Ring, and Henk Volberda. We
 are also grateful for the constructive and valuable comments and
 suggestions that we received from the four anonymous reviewers
 and the editors of the special issue. We further wish to express our
 gratitude to participants and attendees of the following workshops,
 seminars, and conferences: NHH (2007), Global Sourcing:
 Services, Knowledge and Innovation (2007), the 65th Academy of
 Management Conference (2006), the 7th International Conference on
 Organizational Discourse (2006), and the workshop Understanding
 Coordination Within and Between Organizations: Lessons from
 Software Development (2004). Participants in these events provided
 us with comments and suggestions that improved the paper. The
 research has also benefited from the financial support of Erasmus
 University Trust Fund, Erasmus Research Institute of Management
 (ERIM), Netherlands Defense Academy, and London Business
 School. Finally, we would like to thank the vendor company that we
 studied for its generous cooperation. All remaining errors are the
 responsibility of the authors.
 References
 Ahuja, M. K, and Carley, K. M. 1999. "Network Structure in
 Virtual Organizations," Organization Science (10:6), pp.
 741-757.
 Ahuja, M. K, and Galvin, J. E. 2003. "Socialization in Virtual
 Groups," Journal of Management (29:2),pp. 161-185.
 Armstrong, D.J., and Cole, P. 2002. "Managing Distances and Dif
 ferences in Geographically Distributed Work Groups," in Distri
 buted Work: New Ways of Working across Distance Using Tech
 248 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2/June 2008
 This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
 Vlaar et al./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 indirect communication setup: most of the vendor employees
 reside at offshore delivery centers, usually in India, Eastern
 Europe, or Latin America (Carmel 1999), while relatively few
 of them are located at client locations (e.g., North America,
 Europe, Singapore, and Japan). Onsite team members closely
 interact with the client to gauge requirements and transfer
 these to the offshore team, which then completes the work and
 sends it back to the onsite team that eventually arranges
 delivery to the customer (Krishna et al. 2004). On the one
 hand, this indirect setup reduces economic costs, as the
 majority of the project members reside in a low cost location.
 On the other hand, it also amplifies coordination costs and
 challenges related to the development of understandings, as
 both onsite and offshore teams have to cope with a lack of
 shared context and information (Carmel 1999; Carmel and
 Agarwal 2002; Herbsleb and Mockus 2003). Second, rela
 tionships between onsite and offshore vendor teams are
 characterized by asymmetries in knowledge and experience.
 Onsite teams tend to consist of highly experienced and
 competent members that interact with the client, whereas
 offshore teams represent a mix of experienced and novice
 employees. Offshore centers serve as a learning ground for
 new recruits, and attrition?a growing concern for offshore
 vendors?generally leads to a high turnover of employees.
 This structure entails inherent knowledge and experience
 asymmetries between onsite and offshore vendor teams,
 increasing the potential for misunderstandings.
 Challenges of communication and understanding in offshore
 ISD are most pronounced during requirements development,
 which we define as the framing of expectations concerning
 the business value and technical properties of information
 systems (Davidson 2002; Nuseibeh and Easterbrook 2000).
 First, the craft character of software imposes the need for
 interactivity among developers, but the exchange of docu
 ments is generally insufficient for making the rationale behind
 a code transparent to others (Metiu 2006). Second, software
 development generally entails high levels of ambiguity and
 uncertainty, causing inconsistencies and differences in per
 ception and understanding among stakeholders (Kellogg et al.
 2006; Kraut and Streeter 1995). Third, stakeholders possess
 different and evolving interests and conceptions of reality,
 making it difficult to interpret and analyze requirements
 (Bergman et al. 2002; Brooks 1975; Gorschek and Wohlin
 2006; Nuseibeh and Easterbrook 2000). The resulting prob
 lems of communication and understanding are significant as
 requirements development is considered a crucial activity for
 ISD (Aurum and Wohlin 2005; Davidson 2002; Sommerville
 and Sawyer 1997). Better understandings of software require
 ments may help stakeholders to select and prioritize projects
 and minimize efforts wasted on unnecessary functionality,
 while reducing feature creep, defects, and rework (Damian
 and Chisan 2006; Wiegers 2006). Moreover, consequences
 of errors, omissions, or misunderstandings in requirements
 development tend to cascade into later phases of software
 development (Edwards 2005), causing it to be significant
 beyond "a single phase that is carried out and completed at
 the outset of product development" (Hull et al. 2005, p. 6).
 Empirical evidence on the challenges associated with require
 ments development in offshore ISD is starting to accumulate.
 In a study involving U.S., Dutch, and Indian practitioners,
 Sinha et al. (2006, pp. 52-53), for example, found that "com
 municating and managing requirements in a distributed
 setting" was their primary concern. Similarly, Damian and
 Zowghi (2003, p. 158) advanced that improving "communi
 cation between remote stakeholders will have the greatest
 effect in reducing the impact of global collaboration on man
 aging requirements in multi-site organizations." Accordingly,
 scholars conjecture that the micro-processes involved in
 advancing understandings during requirements development
 deserve closer examination (Damian and Zowghi 2003;
 Davidson 2002; Hull et al. 2005).
 Understanding and Communication
 In line with these observations, understanding and communi
 cation have emerged as central concepts in the literature on
 distributed work (see Cramton 2001; Hinds and Bailey 2003;
 Maznevski and Chudoba 2000; Montoya-Weiss et al. 2001)
 and in the literature on offshore ISD in particular (e.g., Levina
 and Ross 2003; Majchrzak et al. 2005; Metiu 2006; Polzer et
 al. 2006; Sarker and Sahay 2004). They are likely to further
 gain in importance as people increasingly act not only ac
 cording to "their understanding of the rules and routines
 governing their work," but also according to their under
 standing of "tasks and the reality in which they act" (Sand
 berg and Targama 2007, p. 9). Understanding and commu
 nication thus progressively serve as a basis for coordinated
 and collective action (Cronin and Weingart 2007; Rathe and
 Witt 2001; Vlaar et al. 2006; Witt 1998, 2000).
 But what do we mean with understanding? The notion of
 understanding implies that individuals use their cognitive
 capability to think about an issue in their task environment
 (Spender 1996). They focus their attention on a particular
 phenomenon and invest mental efforts in developing more
 meaningful and elaborate thoughts (Bakhtin 1986; Weick et
 al. 2005). Researchers have developed numerous labels to
 describe understandings that are in some sense similar,
 shared, overlapping, compatible, or complementary (see
 Cannon-Bowers and Salas 2001). Following Cronin and
 Weingart (2007) and Sandberg and Targama (2007), we focus
 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2/June 2008 231
This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
 Vlaar et al./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 nology, P. J. Hinds and S. Kiesler (eds.), Cambridge, MA: MIT
 Press.
 Ashford, S. J., Blatt, R., and Van de Walle, D. 2003. "Reflections
 on the Looking Glass: A Review of Research on Feedback
 Seeking Behavior in Organizations," Journal of Management
 (29:6), pp. 773-799.
 Aurum, A., and Wohlin, C. 2005. "Requirements Engineering:
 Setting the Context," in Engineering and Managing Software
 Requirements, A. Aurum and C. Wohlin (eds.), New York:
 Springer, pp. 1-15.
 Baba, M. L., Gluesing, J., Ratner, H., and Wagner, K. H. 2004.
 "The Contexts of Knowing: Natural History of a Globally
 Distributed Team," Journal of Organizational Behavior (25), pp.
 547-587.
 Bakhtin, M. 1986. Speech Genres and Other Essays, Austin, TX:
 University of Texas Press.
 Balogun, J., and Johnson, G. 2004. "Organizational Restructuring
 and Middle Manager Sensemaking," Academy of Management
 Journal {MA), pp. 523-549.
 Bardram, J. E. 2000. "Temporal Coordination," Computer Sup
 ported Cooperative Work (9), pp. 157-187.
 Bechky, B. A. 2003. "Sharing Meaning Across Occupational Com
 munities: The Transformation of Understanding on a Production
 Floor," Organization Science (14:3), pp. 312-330.
 Bechky, B. A. 2006. "Gaffers, Gofers, and Grips: Role-Based
 Coordination in Temporary Organizations," Organization
 Science (17:1), pp. 3-21.
 Bergman, M., King, J. L., and Lyytinen, K. 2002. "Large Scale
 Requirements Analysis Revisited: The Need for Understanding
 the Political Ecology of Requirements Engineering," Require
 ments Engineering (7), pp. 152-171.
 Bhat, J. M., Gupta, ML, and Murthy, S. N. 2006. "Overcoming
 Requirements Engineering Challenges: Lessons from Offshore
 Outsourcing," IEEE Software (23:5), pp. 38-44.
 Bhattacherjee, A. 2001. "Understanding Information Systems
 Continuance: An Expectation-Confirmation Model," MIS Quar
 terly (25:3), pp. 351-370.
 Bigley, G. A., and Roberts, K. H. 2001. "The Incident Command
 System: High Reliability Organizing for Complex and Volatile
 Task Environments," Academy of Management Journal (44:6),
 pp. 1281-1299.
 Boland, R. J. 1991. "Information Systems Use as a Hermeneutic
 Process," in Information Systems Research: Contemporary
 Approaches and Emergent Traditions, H.-E. Nissen, H. H. Klein
 andR. Hirschheim (eds.), Amsterdam: North-Holland, 1991, pp.
 439-458.
 Boland, R. J., and Tenkasi, R. V. 1995. "Perspective Making and
 Perspective Taking in Communities of Knowing," Organization
 Science (6:4), pp. 350-372.
 Bowman, C, and Ambrosini, V. 2000. "Value Creation Versus
 Value Capture: Towards a Coherent Definition of Value in
 Strategy," British Journal of Management (11:1), pp. 1-15.
 Brooks, F. P. 1975. The Mythical Man-Month: Essays on Software
 Engineering, Reading, MA: Addison-Wesley Publishing
 Company.
 Cairncross, F. 2001. Death of Distance: How the Communication
 Revolution Is Changing Our Lives, Boston: Harvard Business
 School Press.
 Campbell, D. J. 1988. "Task Complexity: A Review and
 Analysis," Academy of Management Review, (13:1), pp. 40-52.
 Cannon-Bowers, J. A., and Salas, E. 2001. "Reflections on Shared
 Cognition," Journal of Organizational Behavior (22), pp.
 195-202.
 Carlile, P. R. 2004. "Transferring, Translating, and Transforming:
 An Integrative Framework for Managing Knowledge Across
 Boundaries," Organization Science (15:5), pp. 555-568.
 Carlson, J. R., and Zmud, R.W. 1999. "Channel Expansion Theory
 and the Experiential Nature of Media Richness Perceptions,"
 Academy ofManagement Journal (42:2), pp. 153-170.
 Carmel, E. 1999. Global Software Teams: Collaborating Across
 Borders and Time Zones, Englewood Cliffs, NJ: Prentice Hall.
 Carmel, E., and Abbott, P. 2006. "Configurations of Global Soft
 ware Development: Offshore Versus Nearshore," in Proceedings
 of the 28h International Conference on Software Engineering,
 Shanghai, May 20-28, pp. 3-7.
 Carmel, E., and Agarwal, R. 2001. "Tactical Approaches for
 Alleviating Distance in Global Software Development," IEEE
 Software (18:2), pp. 22-29.
 Carmel, E., and Agarwal, R. 2002. "The Maturation of Offshore
 Sourcing of IT Work," MIS Quarterly Executive (1:2), pp. 65-77.
 Carmel, E., and Tjia, P. 2005. Offshoring Information Technology
 Sourcing and Outsourcing to a Global Workforce, Cambridge,
 UK: Cambridge University Press.
 Chudoba, K. M., Watson-Mannheim, M. B., Crowston, K., and Lee,
 C.S. 2006. "A Practice View on Meetings: The Impact of ICTs
 on Organizational Form and Function," paper presented at the
 66th Academy of Management Conference, Atlanta, GA, August
 11-16.
 Cramton, C. D. 2001. "The Mutual Knowledge Problem and its
 Consequences for Dispersed Collaboration," Organization
 Science (12:3), pp. 346-371.
 Cramton, C. D. 2002. "Finding Common Ground in Dispersed
 Collaboration," Organizational Dynamics (30:4), pp. 356-367.
 Cramton, C. D., and Hinds, P. L. 2005. "Subgroup Dynamics in
 Internationally Distributed Teams: Ethnocentrism or Cross
 National Learning?," Research in Organizational Behavior (2?),
 pp. 231-263.
 Cramton, C. D., and Orvis, K. L. 2003. "Overcoming Barriers to
 Information Sharing in Virtual Teams," in Virtual Teams that
 Work: Creating Conditions for Virtual Team Effectiveness, C. B.
 Gibson and S. G. Cohen (eds.), San Francisco: Jossey-Bass, pp.
 214-230.
 Cronin, M. A., and Weingart, L. R. 2007. "Representational Gaps,
 Information Processing, and Conflict in Functionally Diverse
 Teams," Academy of Management Review (32:3), pp. 761-773.
 Cullen, S., Seddon, P. B., and Willcocks, L. P. 2005. "Managing
 Outsourcing: The Process Imperative," MIS Quarterly Executive
 (4:1), pp. 229-246.
 Dahlstedt., A., and Persson, A. 2005. "Requirements Inter
 dependencies: State of the Art and Future Challenges," in
 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2/June 2008 249
This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
 Vlaar et al./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 on understandings that are at least congruent with each other,
 so that different parties envision comparable behaviors and
 outcomes. Taking this position is warranted by the fact that
 individual understandings almost always differ (Bechky 2003;
 Donnellon et al. 1986; Gibson 2001; Maitlis 2005; Ngwen
 yama and Lee 1997). After all, people will generally under
 stand, interpret, and attend to situations differently (Baba et
 al. 2004; Cronin and Weingart 2007) because of structural
 differences in prior experience (Balogun and Johnson 2004),
 bounded rationality (Simon 1997), and discrepancies in in
 terests and objectives among stakeholders (Vlaar et al. 2006).
 By focusing on congruent and actionable instead of shared,
 mutual, or common understandings (see Donnellon et al.,
 1986; Weick and Roberts, 1993), we thus avoid becoming
 "trapped" in recommending practitioners to engage in costly
 and time-consuming activities such as education and training
 to equalize their knowledge and experience. The latter would
 cause benefits from specialization to dissipate (see also Grant
 1996) and it potentially interferes with creativity and
 innovation by homogenizing diverse perspectives (Cannon
 Bowers and Salas 2001; Cronin and Weingart 2007; Levina
 and Vaast 2005). Instead, we recognize that the goal should
 be not to reduce diversity in perspectives, but rather to capita
 lize on distinct views in order to cocreate understandings that
 are sufficiently congruent and actionable so as to achieve pur
 poseful collective action. We also deliberately use the plural
 noun in discussing congruent and actionable understandings,
 rejecting the notion that multiple individuals may hold a
 single thought and form a single brain (Bigley and Roberts
 2001; Cronin and Weingart, 2007; Donnellon et al. 1986;
 Weick and Roberts 1993). Next, we explore the adjectives
 congruent and actionable in more detail.
 The term congruence qualifies the relationship between the
 expectations held and the actions and outcomes produced by
 different individuals (Weick 2006; Weick et al. 2005). From
 a hermeneutics point of view, it indicates that understandings
 have to be at a minimum consistent or compatible. Parti
 cularly, congruence refers to the extent to which person A's
 and person B's understandings of a certain task interrelate in
 a fashion that is perceived as being coherent and compatible
 (see Gaehde and Hartmann 2006; Gibson 2001).
 Concerning actionability, we advance that although members
 may develop congruent understandings, they may still be
 unable to act upon these understanding due to a lack of infor
 mation and resources, or because of organizational and
 contextual constraints (Cramton 2001; Hull et al. 2005; Johns
 2006). Actionability thus refers to the capability of members
 to configure and execute action patterns in a manner coher
 ently tied to someone else's expectations. To be congruent
 and actionable, understandings then need to have the same
 behavioral implications or lead to the same outcomes (Cronin
 and Weingart 2007; Donnellon et al. 1986).
 We advance that understandings of different people become
 more congruent and actionable with each other if they fulfill
 at least three conditions. First, individuals should direct their
 thinking toward the same behaviors or outcomes. In software
 development this involves questions such as "Are we building
 the right product?" and "Are we building the product right?"
 (Katasonov and Sakkinen 2006). Second, individuals should
 have the same temporal orientation (see Bardram 2000; Emir
 bayer and Mische 1998) in that they are either considering
 things retrospectively (Weick 1995), focusing on the here and
 now, or contemplating on future behavior and outcomes. In
 the case of IS requirements development, the focus is com
 monly on the latter category, involving the development of
 expectations about the behavior and output that should be pro
 duced by oneself and other (Weick 2006; Weick et al. 2005).
 After all, requirements tend to serve as a basis for future
 behavior and outcomes. Third, individuals have the ability to
 translate their understanding into actions contributing to
 collective value creation.
 Considering these conditions, understandings of tasks and
 requirements are thus less likely to be congruent and action
 able if individuals (1) focus their thinking on different out
 comes and/or behaviors; (2) adopt distinct time orientations;
 and/or (3) cannot act upon their understandings.
 Methods HHHHHHBHBHHHHH1
 Presuming that congruent and actionable understandings are
 socially constructed and that they emerge from iterative
 communication processes (see Cramton 2001; Damian and
 Chisan 2006; Davidson 2002; Gergen et al. 2001; Gibson and
 Earley 2007), we conducted a case study to examine our
 research question. Case studies are ideally suited when the
 investigator has limited control over events and boundaries of
 a phenomenon (i.e., developing understandings) and when the
 phenomenon and the context in which it is investigated (i.e.,
 offshore outsourcing) are unclear or closely related (Yin
 2002). Challenges of understanding and communication
 within offshore ISD projects satisfy these criteria. Moreover,
 case studies provide "a source of well grounded, rich descrip
 tions and explanations of processes occurring in local
 contexts" (Miles and Huberman 1994, p. 15), which makes
 them well suited for studying and building theory on emergent
 232 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2/June 2008
This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
 Vlaar et al./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 Engineering and Managing Software Requirements, A. Aurum
 and C. Wohlin (eds.), New York: Springer, pp. 95-116.
 Damian, D., and Chisan, J. 2006. "An Empirical Study of the
 Complex Relationships between Requirements Engineering
 Processes and other Processes that Lead to Payoffs in Pro
 ductivity, Quality and Risk Management," IEEE Transactions on
 Software Engineering (32:7), pp. 433-453.
 Damian, D. E., and Zowghi, D. 2003. "Requirements Engineering
 Challenges in Multi-Site Software Development Organizations,"
 Requirements Engineering (8), pp. 149-160.
 Davidson, E. J. 2002. "Technology Frames and Framing: ASocio
 Cognitive Investigation of Requirements Determination," MIS
 Quarterly (26:4), pp. 329-358.
 Davis, A. M., and Zowghi, D. 2006. "Good Requirements Practices
 are Neither Necessary nor Sufficient," Requirements Analysis
 (11:1), pp. 1-3.
 Davis, G. B., Ein-Dor, P., King, W. R., and Torkzadeh, R. 2004.
 "Information Technology Offshoring: Prospects, Challenges,
 Educational Requirements, and Curriculum Implications," in
 Proceedings of 23*1 International Conference on Information
 Systems, R. Agarwal, L. Kirsch, and J. I. DeGross (eds.),
 Washington, DC, December 12-15, pp. 1027-1038.
 Donnellon, A., Gray, B., and Bougon, M. G. 1986. "Communi
 cation, Meaning, and Organized Action," Administrative Science
 Quarterly (31:1), pp. 43-55.
 Edwards, H. K. 2005. "Analysis of Software Requirements
 Engineering Exercises in a Global Virtual Team Setup," Journal
 of Global Information Management (13:2), pp. 21-41.
 Eisenhardt, K. M. 1989. "Building Theories from Case Study
 Research," AcademyotManagementReview(14:4),pp. 532-550.
 Eisenhardt, K. M., and Graebner, M. 2007. "Theory Building from
 Cases: Opportunities and Challenges," Academy of Management
 Journal (50:1), pp. 25-32.
 Emirbayer, M., and Mische, A. 1998. "What Is Agency?,"
 American Journal of Sociology (103:4), pp. 962-1023.
 Espinosa, J. A., and Carmel, E. 2003. "The Impact of Time
 Separation on Coordination in Global Software Teams: A Con
 ceptual Foundation," Software Process Improvement and
 Practice (8), pp. 249-266.
 Faraj, S., and Sproull, L. 2000. "Coordinating Expertise in
 Software Development Teams," Management Science (46:12),
 pp. 1154-1568.
 Feeny, D., Lacity, M. C, and Willcocks, L. P. 2005. "Taking the
 Measure of Outsourcing Providers," Sloan Management Review
 (46:3), pp. 203-244.
 Felin, T., and Hesterley, W. S. 2007. "The Knowledge-Based
 View, Nested Heterogeneity, and New Value Creation: Philo
 sophical Considerations on the Locus of Knowledge," Academy
 of Management Review (32:1), pp. 195-218.
 Fiss, P. C, and Zajac, E. J. 2006. "The Symbolic Management of
 Strategic Change: Sensegiving via Framing and Decoupling,"
 Academy of Management Journal (49:6), pp. 1173-1193.
 Gaehde, U., and Hartmann, S. 2006. Coherence, Truth and Testi
 mony, Berlin: Springer.
 Galliers, R. D., and Swan, J. A. 2000. "There's More to Infor
 mation Systems Development than Structured Approaches:
 Information Requirements Analysis as a Socially Mediated
 Process," Requirements Engineering (5), pp. 74-82.
 Galunic, D. C, and Rodan, S. 1998. "Resource Recombinations in
 the Firm: Knowledge Structures and the Potential for
 Schumpeterian Innovation," Strategic Management Journal
 (19:12), pp. 1193-1201.
 Gergen, K. J., McNamee, S., and Barrett, F. J. 2001. "Towards
 Transformative Dialogue," International Journal of Public
 Administration (24:7/8), pp. 679-707.
 Gibson, C. A. 2001. "Me and Us: Differential Relationships
 Among Goal-Setting Training, Efficacy and Effectiveness at the
 Individual and Team Level," Journal of Organizational Behavior
 (22:7), pp. 789-808.
 Gibson, C. A., and Cohen, S. G. 2003. Virtual Teams that Work:
 Creating Conditions for Virtual Team Effectiveness, San
 Francisco: Jossey-Bass.
 Gibson, C. A., and Earley, P. C. 2007. "Collective Cognition in
 Action: Accumulation, Interaction, Examination, and Accommo
 dation in the Development and Operation of Group Efficacy
 Beliefs in the Workplace," Academy of Management Review
 (32:2), pp. 438-458.
 Gibson, C. B., and Gibbs, J. L. 2006. "Unpacking the Concept of
 Virtuality: The Effects of Geographic Dispersion, Electronic
 Dependence, Dynamic Structure, and National Diversity on
 Team Innovation," Administrative Science Quarterly (51), pp.
 451-495.
 Gioia, D. A., and Chittipeddi, K. 1991. "Sensemaking and Sense
 giving in Strategic Change Initiation," Strategic Management
 Journal {12:6), pp. 433-448.
 Gioia, D. A., Thomas, J. B., Clark, S. M., and Chittipeddi, K. 1994.
 "Symbolism and Strategic Change in Academia: The Dynamics
 of Sensemaking and Influence," Organization Science (5:3), pp.
 363-383.
 Gorschek, T., and Wohlin, C. 2006. "Requirements Abstraction
 Model," Requirements Engineering (11:1), pp. 79-101.
 Grant, R. M. 1996. "Toward a Knowledge-based Theory of the
 Firm," Strategic Management Journal (17: Winter Special Issue),
 pp. 109-122.
 Griffith, T. L., Sawyer, J. E., and Neale, M. A. 2003. "Virtualness
 and Knowledge in Teams: Managing the Love Triangle of
 Organizations, Individuals, and Information Technology," MIS
 Quarterly (27:3), pp. 265-287.
 Hands, K, Peiris, D. R., and Gregor, P. 2005. "Development of a
 Computer-Based Interviewing Tool to Enhance the Requirements
 Gathering Process," Requirements Engineering (10), pp.
 204-216.
 Hargadon, A. B., and Bechky, B. A. 2006. "When Collections of
 Creatives Become Creative Collectives: A Field Study of Prob
 lem Solving at Work," Organization Science (17:4), pp. 484-500.
 Herbsleb, J. D., and Mockus, A. 2003. "An Empirical Study of
 Speed and Communication in Globally-Distributed Software
 Development," IEEE Transactions on Software Engineering
 (29:3), pp. 481-494.
 Herbsleb, J. D., and Moitra, D. 2001. "Global Software Develop
 ment," IEEE Software (29:1), pp. 16-20.
 250 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2/June 2008
 This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
 Vlaar et al./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 phenomena at the micro-level, including communication and
 understanding (Baba et al. 2004; Eisenhardt and Graebner
 2007). Following Eisenhardt (1989, p. 536), we started with
 a priori definitions of the central constructs in our study,
 which helped us in developing "firmer empirical grounding
 for the emergent theory." At the same time, we deliberately
 selected an inductive pathway guided by broad research
 questions rather than a priori hypotheses, with the aim of
 generating propositions (consistent with Baba et al. 2004).
 Case Selection
 We applied two case selection criteria. First, we focused on
 an Indian vendor, as India is the world's leading offshore out
 sourcing destination and because Indian vendors such as
 Infosys Technologies and Tata Consultancy Services have
 become more and more sophisticated (Lewin and Peeters
 2006). Offshore IT-services and back-office work in India are
 expected to grow into a U.S. $57 billion annual export
 industry in 2008 (Kripalani and Engardio 2003), and 40 per
 cent of the companies that have achieved a level-five CMM
 certification currently reside in India (King 2006). Addi
 tionally, one of us worked at a major Indian offshore vendor
 for more than 2.5 years on projects for a U.S. retail chain and
 a U.S. insurance firm. He therefore had intimate experience
 with working in an Indian offshore vendor team (first as a
 junior programmer, later as a module leader), enabling him to
 empathize with our informants. This also provided us with
 the opportunity to interview participants in their native
 language (Hindi), thus diminishing potential misinterpre
 tations arising from cultural differences. The Western
 backgrounds of the other authors further enriched discussions
 and enabled us to view the case from multiple angles.
 Second, we decided to focus on communication and under
 standing among members of onsite and offshore vendor
 teams. ISD vendor studies are still rare (Levina and Ross
 2003), partly because of language problems and confi
 dentiality agreements between vendors and clients. However,
 a focus on distributed vendor teams promises to reduce
 potentially confounding effects emanating from incentive and
 contracting issues, or from top management inexperience with
 ISD offshoring. These issues are more likely to surface in
 studies on client-vendor relationships. In line with this
 argument, we selected a project conducted for a client in the
 financial services industry, as such firms were the first to
 experiment with offshore outsourcing setups, and as they
 comprise the major revenue generators for Indian offshore
 vendors (Lewin and Peeters 2006). This makes them rela
 tively mature in working with offshore vendors, reducing the
 risk that problems stemming from inexperience with off
 shoring, or from incentive and contracting issues cascade
 from the client-vendor relationship into the onsite-offshore
 vendor team relationship. After exchanging ideas with project
 managers, the FINANCE project (fictitious name) was
 chosen, as it satisfied all selection criteria. This project
 represents a revelatory case study (Levina and Ross 2003; Yin
 2002), offering us unique access to members of onsite and
 offshore vendor teams.
 Data Collection and Data Analysis
 As we intended to investigate the development of congruent
 and actionable understandings within a real-life context and
 because the vendor firm was prohibited from sharing beha
 vioral data with third parties, we chose to elicit the stories and
 accounts of onsite and offshore team members concerning the
 latest requirements upon which they had worked. This
 minimized the risk that participants displayed retrospective
 bias, and that they forgot some of the subtleties in their
 interactions with members of the other team. Data was col
 lected from various data sources and with the help of different
 data collection methods, enabling triangulation (Eisenhardt
 1989). We used unstructured and semi-structured interviews,
 surveys, documents, and e-mail exchanges to establish a
 clearer picture of the patterns of communication and under
 standing that were ensuing among members of onsite and
 offshore ISD vendor teams. Each step of the research process
 was explicitly operationalized and documented, which
 enhanced the reliability of our inquiry (see Yin 2002).
 In May 2006, we conducted 18 interviews, 8 with onsite and
 10 with offshore team members, spread over four project
 modules (Table 1). The interviews, which were guided by a
 semi-structured interview protocol (Appendix A), were
 conducted over the phone, as our informants worked in geo
 graphically remote locations. The interviews were held in
 either English or Hindi, allowing informants to speak in their
 mother tongue, and increasing their comfort level, so that they
 would candidly share their views and ideas. Follow-up e
 mails were sent to request clarifications and to offer infor
 mants the opportunity to provide feedback. Interviews were
 all recorded and fully transcribed (the ones in Hindi were
 translated into English). Subsequently, we sent a tailored
 survey to members of the onsite and the offshore team (for the
 onsite version, which is comparable to the offshore version,
 see Appendix B). The aim of this survey (n = 18) was to
 obtain more information about the team members, such as
 their level of experience and expertise. Another survey (n =
 52) was distributed among offshore vendor personnel in
 different projects to assess which factors they considered most
 important for project success.
 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2/June 2008 233
This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
 Vlaar et al./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 Hinds, P. J., and Bailey, D. 2003. "Out of Sight, Out of Sync:
 Understanding Conflict in Distributed Teams," Organization
 Science (14:6), pp. 615-632.
 Hinds,P.J.,andKiesler,S. 2002. Distributed Work: New Ways of
 Working Across Distance Using Technology, Cambridge, MA:
 MIT Press.
 Hinds, P. J., and Mortensen, M. 2005. "Understanding Conflict in
 Geographically Distributed Teams: The Moderating Effects of
 Shared Identity, Shared Context, and Spontaneous Communi
 cation," Organization Science (16:3), pp. 290-307.
 Hull, E., Jackson, K, and Dick, J. 2005. Requirements Engi
 neering, London: Springer.
 Jarvenpaa, S. L., and Leidner, D. E. 1999. "Communication and
 Trust in Global Virtual Teams," Organization Science (10:6), pp.
 791-815.
 Johns, G. 2006. "The Essential Impact of Context on Organi
 zational Behavior," Academy of Management Review (31:2), pp.
 386-408.
 Kaiya, H., Shinbara, D., Kawano, J., and Saeki, M. 2005.
 "Improving the Detection of Requirements Discordances among
 Stakeholders," Requirements Engineering (10), pp. 289-303.
 Kang, S.-C, Morris, S. S., and Snell, S. A. 2007. "Relational
 Archetypes, Organizational Learning, and Value Creation:
 Extending the Human Resource Architecture," Academy of
 Management Review (32:1), pp. 236-256.
 Katasonov, A., and Sakkinen, M. 2006. "Requirements Quality
 Control: A Unifying Framework," Requirements Analysis (11:1),
 pp. 42-57.
 Kellogg, K, Orlikowski, W. J., and Yates, J. 2006. "Life in the
 Trading Zone: Structuring Coordination Across Boundaries in
 Postbureaucratic Organizations," Organization Science (17:1),
 pp. 22-44.
 Kern, T., Willcocks, L. P., and Van Heck, E. 2002. "The Winner's
 Curse in IT Outsourcing: Strategies for Avoiding Relational
 Trauma," California Management Review [\\.2), pp. 47-69.
 Kijkuit, B., and Van den Ende, J. 2007. "The Organizational Life
 of an Idea: Integrating Social Network, Creativity and Decision
 Making Perspectives," Journal of Management Studies (44:6),
 pp. Forthcoming), pp. 863-882.
 Kiesler, S., and Cummings, J.N. 2002. "What Do We Know About
 Proximity and Distance in Work Groups? A Legacy of
 Research," in Distributed Work: New Ways of Working Across
 Distance Using Technology, P. J. Hinds and S. Kiesler (eds),
 Cambridge, MA: MIT Press, pp. 57-80.
 King, W. R. 2005. "Outsourcing and Offshoring: The New IS
 Paradigm?," Journal of Global Information TechnologyManage
 ment (8:2), pp. 1-4.
 King, W. R. 2006. "Offshoring Decision Time is at Hand," Infor
 mation Systems Management (23:3), pp. 102-103.
 Kirkman, B. L., Rosen, B., Gibson, C. B., Tesluk, P. E., and
 McPherson, S. O. 2002. "Five Challenges to Virtual Team
 Success: Lessons from Sabre, Inc.," Academy of Management
 Executive (16:3), pp. 67-79.
 Ko, D.-G., Kirsch, L. J., and King, W. R. 2005. "Antecedents of
 Knowledge Transfer from Consultants to Clients In Enterprise
 System Implementations," MIS Quarterly (29:1), pp. 59-85.
 Kraut, R. E., and Streeter, L. A. 1995. "Coordination in Software
 Development," Communications of the ACM (38:3), pp. 69-81.
 Kripalani, M., and Engardio, P. 2003. "The Rise of India,"
 Business Week, December 8, pp. 38-46.
 Krishna, S., Sahay, S., and Walsham, G. 2004. "Managing
 Cross Cultural Issues in Global Software Outsourcing," Com
 munications of the ACM (47 :4), pp. 62-66.
 Lane, P. J., and Lubatkin, M. 1998. "Relative Absorptive Capacity
 and Interorganizational Learning," Strategic Management
 Journal (19:5), pp. 461-477.
 Lawrence, T. B., and Maitlis, S. 2007. "The Disruption of
 Accounts: Sensebreaking in Organizations," paper presented at
 the Academy of Management Annual Meeting, Honolulu, HI.
 Lepak, D. P., Smith, K. G., and Taylor, M. S. 2007. "Value Crea
 tion and Value Capture: A Multilevel Perspective," Academy of
 Management Review (32:1), pp. 180-194.
 Levina, N., and Ross, J. W. 2003. "From the Vendor's Perspective:
 Exploring the Value Proposition in Information Technology
 Outsourcing," MIS Quarterly (27:3), pp. 331-364.
 Levina, N., and Vaast, E. 2005. "The Emergence of Boundary
 Spanning Competence in Practice: Implications for Implemen
 tation and Use of Information Systems," MIS Quarterly (29:2),
 pp. 335-363.
 Lewin, A. Y., and Peeters, C. 2006. "Offshoring Administrative
 and Technical Work: Business Hype or the Onset of Funda
 mental Strategic and Organizational Transformations?," Long
 Range Planning (39), pp. 221-239.
 Lin, L., Geng, X., and Whinston, A. B. 2005. "A Sender-Receiver
 Framework for Knowledge Transfer," MIS Quarterly (29:2), pp.
 197-219.
 Maitlis, S. 2005. "The Social Processes of Organizational Sense
 making," Academy of Management Journal (AS), pp. 21-49.
 Maitlis, S., and Lawrence, T. B. 2007. "Triggers and Enablers of
 Sensegiving in Organizations," Academy of Management Journal
 (50:1), pp. 57-84.
 Majchrzak, A., Beath, C. M., Lim, R. A., and Chin, W. W. 2005.
 "Managing Client Dialogues During Information Systems Design
 to Facilitate Client Learning," MIS Quarterly (29 A), pp. 653-672.
 Majchrzak, A., Malhotra, A., Stamps, J., and Lipnack, J. 2004.
 "Can Absence Make a Team Grow Stronger," Harvard Business
 Review(S2:5), pp. 131-137
 Malhotra A., and Majchrzak, A. 2005. "Virtual Workspace Tech
 nologies ," MIT Sloan Management Re vie w (4 6:2), pp. 11-14.
 Malhotra, A., Majchrzak, A., Carman, R., and Lott, V. 2001.
 "Radical Innovation Without Collocation: A Case Study at
 Boeing-Rocketdyne," MIS Quarterly (25:2), pp. 229-249.
 Martins, L. L., Gilson, L. L., and Maynard, M. T. 2004. "Virtual
 Teams: What Do We Know and Where Do We Go From Here?,"
 Journal of Management (30:6), pp. 805-835.
 Maznevski, M. L., and Chudoba, K. M. 2000. "Bridging Space
 Over Time: Global Virtual Team Dynamics and Effectiveness,"
 Organization Science (11:5), pp. 473-492.
 McDougall,P. 2005. "ABNAMRO Taps Five Vendors in Massive
 Outsourcing Initiative," Information Week, September 1
 (available at http://www.informationweek.com/story/show
 Article.jhtml?articleID= 170102470).
 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2/June 2008 251
This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
 Vlaar et al./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 Table 1. Overview of Interviewees
 Location Name* Location Role Date (M/D/Y)
 Mr. SK Onsite Team Member 05/03/2006
 Mr. VM Onsite Team Member 05/22/2006
 Mr. AK Onsite Team Member 05/08/2006
 Onsite Mr. NS Onsite Project Leader 05/06/2006 (New Jersey) Mr. NK Onsite Team Member 05/06/2006
 Mr. AB Onsite Team Member 05/08/2006
 Mr. GK Onsite Team Member 05/22/2006
 Ms. AB Onsite Team Member 05/06/2006
 Mr. GS Offshore Team Member 05/16/2006
 Mr. NP Offshore Team Member 05/11/2006
 Mr. VR Offshore Team Member 05/21/2006
 Ms. NH Offshore Team Member 05/09/2006
 Offshore Mr AR Offshore Team Member 05/10/2006 (Banqalore, India) Mr. YP Offshore Team Member 05/11/2006
 Mr. RK Offshore Team Member 05/11/2006
 Mr. RM Offshore Team Member 05/16/2006
 Mr. RP Offshore Team Member 05/12/2006
 _Mr. SK_Offshore_ Team Member 05/13/2006
 *For reasons of confidentiality, we use abbreviations here.
 The initial analyses occurred parallel to data collection
 (Eisenhardt 1989). While conducting the interviews, listening
 to the tapes, and reading transcripts, we wrote down extensive
 comments and discussed potential themes, impressions, and
 patterns in the data. Data analysis then proceeded through
 several overlapping phases (Levina and Ross 2003; Pettigrew
 1990). We started by writing an extensive case description
 (Eisenhardt 1989), which included project history, project
 setup, daily activities, communicative practices, and
 requirements-related processes. This was primarily done by
 the third author, while the other two authors, based on their
 conceptions of the case and their discussions with the third
 author, reviewed and modified the write-up. In the next
 phase, we concentrated on studying particular instances where
 misunderstandings or misinterpretations occurred, and on
 situations in which participants noted that understandings
 were transferred, advanced, or transformed. We closely examined the connections between communicative acts,
 possible antecedents, and the development of understandings.
 Our finding and observations were shared with colleagues in
 several informal conversations, seminars, and conferences.
 This helped us in achieving more precise and convergent
 thoughts on the practices and processes that vendor team
 members used to advance their understandings.
 In the final phase, we connected emergent themes and ideas
 with theoretical concepts from the literature (Pettigrew 1990).
 We adopted Van Maanen's (1979) approach and proceeded
 from facts to first-order concepts to higher-order themes,
 going from interview texts to themes by using open-coding
 techniques, matrices, checklists, and causal diagrams (Miles
 and Huberman 1994; Strauss and Corbin 1998). Constant
 comparison was used to make sure that the themes were
 relevant and salient across multiple interviews. Each of the
 authors reread the interview transcripts several times to link
 empirical evidence to recurring themes and to develop new
 themes. After each major iteration, discussions were held to
 identify and resolve differences in interpretation, refine
 themes, and test their connections with the data. Additionally,
 we organized regular chat, Skype, and face-to-face sessions
 among the authors, ranging from 15 minutes to 4 hours in
 which we discussed emerging themes and reviewer com
 ments, and in which we shared insights from the literature. E
 mail traffic was intense as well (more than 600 e-mails were
 234 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2/June 2008
This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
 Vlaar et al./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 Metiu, A. 2006. "Owning the Code: Status Closure in Distributed
 Groups," Organization Science (17:4), pp. 418-435.
 Miles, M. B., and Huberman, A. M. 1994. Qualitative Data
 Analysis: A Sourcebook of New Methods, Beverly Hills, CA:
 Sage Publications.
 Mills, J. H. 2003. Making Sense of Organizational Change,
 London: Routledge.
 Montoya-Weiss, M. M., Massey, A. P., and Song, M. 2001.
 "Getting IT Together: Temporal Coordination and Conflict
 Management in Global Virtual Teams," Academy of Management
 Journal (44:6), pp. 1251-1262.
 Ngwenyama, O. K, and Lee, A. S. 1997. "Communication Rich
 ness in Electronic Mail: A Critical Social Theory and the Con
 textuality of Meaning," MIS Quarterly (21:2), pp. 145-167.
 Nuseibeh, B., and Easterbrook, S. 2000. "Requirements Engi
 neering: A Roadmap," in Proceedings of the 22*d International
 Conference on Software Engineering, Limerick, Ireland, June
 4-11.
 Orlikowski, W. J. 2002. "Knowing in Practice: Enacting a Col
 lective Capability in Distributed Organizing," Organization
 Science (13:3), pp. 249-273.
 Oza,N.V, and Hall, T 2005. "Difficulties in Managing Offshore
 Software Outsourcing Relationships: An Empirical Analysis of
 18 High Maturity Indian Software Companies," Journal of
 Information Technology Case and Application Research (7:3),
 pp. 25-41.
 Pettigrew, A. M. 1990. "Longitudinal Field Research on Change:
 Theory and Practice," Organization Science (1:3), pp. 267-292.
 Polzer, J., Crisp, B., Jarvenpaa, S., and Kim, J. 2006. "Geographi
 cally-Collocated Subgroups in Globally Dispersed Teams: A
 Test of the Faultline Hypothesis. Academy of Management
 Journal (A9:A), pp. 679-92.
 Postrel, S. 2002. "Islands of Shared Knowledge: Specialization
 and Mutual Understanding in Problem-Solving Teams,"
 Organization Science (13:3), pp. 303-320.
 Pratt, M. G. 2000. "The Good, the Bad, and the Ambivalent:
 Managing Identification Among Am way Distributors," Adminis
 trative Science Quarterly (45:3), pp. 456-493.
 Priem, R. L. 2007. "A Consumer Perspective on Value Creation,"
 Academy of Management Review (32:1), pp. 219-235.
 Prikladnicki, R., Audy, J. L. N., and Evaristo, R. 2003. "Global
 Software Development in Practice Lessons Learned," Software
 Process Improvement and Practice (8), pp. 267-281.
 Ramirez Jr., A., Walther, J. B., Burgoon, J. K, and Sunnafrank, M.
 2002. "Information-Seeking Strategies, Uncertainty, and
 Computer-Mediated Communication: Toward a Conceptual
 Model," Human Communication Research (28:2), pp. 213-228.
 Rathe, K, and Witt, U. 2001. "The Nature of the Firm?Static
 Versus Developmental Interpretations," Journal of Management
 and Governance (5:3/4), pp. 331-351.
 Ravasi, D., and Schultz, M. 2006. "Responding to Organizational
 Identity Threats: Exploring the Role of Organizational Culture,"
 Academy ofManagement Journal (49:3), pp. 433-458.
 Rico, R., Sanchez-Manzanares, M., Gil, F., and Gibson, C. 2008.
 "Team Implicit Coordination Processes: A Team Knowledge
 Based Approach," Academy of Management Review (33:1), pp.
 163-185.
 Ring, P. S., and Van de Ven, A. H. 1994. "Developmental Pro
 cesses of Cooperative Interorganizational Relationships,"
 Academy of Management Review (19:1), pp. 90-118.
 Rottman, J. W., and Lacity, M. C. 2004. "Twenty Practices for
 Offshore Sourcing," MIS Quarterly Executive (3:3), pp. 117-130.
 Rottman, J. W., and Lacity, M. C. 2006. "Proven Practices for
 Effectively Offshoring IT Work," Sloan Management Review
 (47:3), pp. 56-63.
 Rouleau, L. 2005. "Micro-Practices of Strategic Sensemaking and
 Sensegiving: How Middle Managers Interpret and Sell Change
 Every Day," Journal of Management Studies (42:7), pp.
 1413-1441.
 Sandberg, J., and Targama, A. 2007. Managing Understanding in
 Organizations, London: Sage Publications.
 Sarker, S., and Sahay, S. 2004. "Implications of Space and Time
 for Distributed Work: An Interpretive Study of US-Norwegian
 Systems Development Teams," European Journal of In formation
 Systems (13), pp. 3-20.
 Simon, H. A. 1997. Administrative Behavior, NewYork: The Free
 Press.
 Sinha, V., Sengupta, B., and Chandra, S. 2006. "Enabling Colla
 boration in Distributed Requirements Management," IEEE
 Software (23:5), pp. 52-61.
 Sirmon, D. G., Hitt, M. A., and Ireland, R. D. "Managing Firm
 Resources in Dynamic Environments to Create Value: Looking
 Inside the Black Box," Academy of Management Review (32:1),
 pp. 273-292.
 Sole, D., and Edmondson, A. 2002. "Situated Knowledge and
 Learning in Dispersed Teams," British Journal of Management
 (13), pp. S17-S34.
 Sommerville, I., and Sawyer, P. 1997. Requirements Engineering:
 A Good Practice, New York: Wiley.
 Spender, J.-C. 1996. "Making Knowledge the Basis of a Dynamic
 Theory of the Firm," Strategic Management Journal (17: Winter),
 pp. 77-91.
 Strauss, A., and Corbin, J. 1998. Basics of Qualitative Research,
 Thousand Oaks, CA: Sage Publications.
 Sutcliffe, A., Gault, B., and Maiden, N. 2005. "ISRE: Immersive
 Scenario-based Requirements Engineering with Virtual
 Prototypes," Requirements Engineering (10), pp. 95-111.
 Tsoukas, H. 2005. "How Is New Knowledge Created in
 Organizations? A Post-Rationalist Account," Working Paper,
 Athens Laboratory of Business Administration, Athens, Greece.
 Van Maanen, J. 1979. "The Fact of Fiction in Organizational
 Ethnography," Administrative Science Quarterly (24), pp.
 539-550.
 Vlaar, P. W. L., Van den Bosch, F. A. J., and Volberda, H. W.
 2006. "Coping with Problems of Understanding in Interorgani
 zational Relationships: Using Formalization as a Means to Make
 Sense," Organization Studies (21 \ 11), pp. 1617-1638.
 Weick, K. E. 1969. The Social Psychology of Organizing, Reading,
 MA: Addison-Wesley (reprinted in 1979).
 Weick, K. E. 1995. Sensemaking in Organizations, Thousand
 Oaks, CA: Sage Publications.
 Weick, K. E. 2006. "Faith, Evidence, and Action: Better Guesses
 in an Unknowable World," Organization Studies (27:11), pp.
 1723-1736.
 252 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2/June 2008
 This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
 Vlaar et al./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 exchanged between us during the period of writing and
 revising the paper). In further analyzing the data, we con
 tinuously grouped the themes to generate concepts and we
 used multiple causal diagrams to explore relationships
 between these concepts, while simultaneously assessing their
 relations with theoretical notions in the literature. Finally, we
 connected concepts and developed the analytical framework
 presented in Figure 1.
 Results: Case Description
 and Analysis I^^^HHHI^HBII^BlHi
 The offshore vendor is part of one of India's largest con
 glomerates, with revenues of more than U.S. $12 billion in
 2006. It is considered one of the world's leading global IT
 services firms, employing more than 90,000 people. The
 company's clients include various Fortune 500 companies.
 Several of the company's ISD centers are assessed at level
 five of the capability maturity model. Clients include firms in
 industries such as financial services, manufacturing, telecom
 munications, and media and entertainment. The FINANCE
 project was initiated for a leading U.S. financial institution in
 2002, with New Jersey as the client and onsite vendor team
 location, and Bangalore, India, as the offshore team location.
 The project, situated in the vendor's application services
 department, had generated revenues of around U.S. $ 1 million
 over the last 4 years.
 The FINANCE project was divided into four modules (see
 Appendix C). We intentionally selected multiple modules
 within this project so as to augment the diversity of issue
 domains and characteristics affecting communication and
 understanding in our empirical study. This would enhance the
 generalizability of our findings (see also Maitlis and
 Lawrence 2007). The project involved four different pro
 gramming and controlling languages: IBM's Job Control
 Language (JCL), IBM's Report Program Generator II (RPG
 II), FOCUS, and VPLUS. The system (platform) used was an
 HP 3000, a midrange mainframe machine released by Hewlett
 Packard in 1973. The main application used to manage
 distributed software development was a configuration man
 agement tool called ChangeMan. The offshore team was
 working directly on the client's machines in the U.S. through
 a virtual private network. To enable version control of
 various documents and program files, offshore used Micro
 soft's Virtual SourceSafe. Communication between onsite
 and offshore team members primarily involved conference
 calls and e-mail traffic. Instant messaging was rarely used
 due to significant time-zone differences between the onsite
 and offshore location.
 Although the size and composition of the onsite and offshore
 project teams changed over the years, in May 2006, the onsite
 team consisted of nine members, including a project leader
 responsible for the interface with the client. The offshore
 team comprised 13 members, including a project leader
 responsible for project management. Most of the offshore
 team members had not visited the client site nor had they met
 onsite team members personally. Information on tasks and
 requirements came primarily in the form of documentation
 composed by the onsite team. In the initial stages, offshore
 team members tried to understand the content of these
 documents and they attempted to understand the written text,
 based on their comprehension of IS development termino
 logies and their experience with the project. From the
 requirements document, they could only develop a narrow
 conception of the actual requirements issued by the client's
 business users, as is illustrated by the following quotes.
 We were given requirement documents, and we
 started with those documents.... We faced so many
 things when we started.. .many unexpected things. I
 can understand the requirements, but onsite knows
 more. (Interview with YP, Offshore)
 They do deliver what they are asked, but since they
 don't carry the same perspective, you have to very
 specifically ask them about particular things.... The
 way you think is not necessarily the way they think.
 (Interview with GK, Onsite)
 The problem with these technical documents was that off
 shore team members could only develop literal under
 standings of the requirements. They were not really able to
 relate the text to the context from which these requirements
 originated and to the final systems in which they had to
 function. This caused misunderstandings between members
 of onsite and offshore vendor teams.
 For certain functionality we have made a document
 and sent it off to request changes and testing to be
 done.... They [offshore] construct or change things
 according to the technical document... but they can
 not test the global picture, the aim of the business,
 the impact on upstream and downstream, and
 whether it is fulfilling business requirements or not.
 They cannot assess these things. That is why there
 are gaps. (Interview with NS, Onsite)
 Knowledge and Experience Asymmetries
 Onsite team members noted that the offshore team was hardly
 exposed to information about the client's business. A lack of
 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2/June 2008 235
This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
 Vlaar et al./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 Weick, K. E., and Roberts, K. 1993. "Collective Mind in Organi
 zations: Heedful Interrelating on Flight Decks," Administrative
 Science Quarterly (38), pp. 357-381.
 Weick, K. E., Sutcliffe, K. M., and Obstfeld, D. 2005. "Organizing
 and the Process of Sensemaking," Organization Science (16:4),
 pp. 409-421.
 Wiegers, K. E. 2006. More About Software Requirements,
 Redmond, WA: Microsoft Press.
 Witt, U. 1998. "Imagination and Leadership?The Neglected
 Dimension of an Evolutionary Theory of the Firm," Journal of
 Economic Behavior & Organization (35), pp. 161-177.
 Witt, U. 2000. "Changing Cognitive Frames?Changing Organiza
 tional Forms: An Entrepreneurial Theory of Organizational
 Development," Industrial and Corporate Change (9:4), pp.
 733-755.
 Yin, R. K. 2002. Case Study Research: Design and Methods,
 Newbury Park, CA: Sage Publications.
 About the Authors
 Paul W. L. Vlaar (Ph.D. cum laude RSM Erasmus University) is an
 assistant professor at the Department of Management and Organi
 zation of the Vrije Universiteit Amsterdam. His work has been
 published in various journals including Group & Organization
 Management and Organization Studies. He has also contributed to
 Knowledge Processes in Globally Distributed Contexts (Palgrave,
 2008), Handbook of Strategic Alliances (Palgrave, 2006), and
 Research in Competence-Based Management (Elsevier, 2005). His
 book, entitled Contracts and Trust in Alliances: Discovering, Creating
 and Appropriating Value, is forthcoming in 2008 from Edward
 Elgar. His current research interests include the management and
 governance of interorganizational relationships, and issues of
 culture, understanding, and communication in outsourcing and
 offshoring relations.
 Paul C. van Fenema (Ph.D. cum laude RSM Erasmus University)
 is an associate professor at the Netherlands Defense Academy. He
 previously held positions as an assistant professor at RSM Erasmus
 University and as a visiting researcher at Florida International
 University. His research focuses on coordination of global IS
 projects, distributed social cognition, and high reliability organi
 zations. His work has been published or is forthcoming in Com
 munications of the ACM, Information Systems Journal, European
 Journal of Information Systems, and Cognition Technology & Work.
 He has also contributed to Knowledge Processes in Globally
 Distributed Contexts (Palgrave, 2008), Managing Multinational
 Teams: Global Perspectives (Elsevier/JAI, 2005), and Information
 Systems at the Core: European Perspectives on Deploying and
 Managing Information Systems in Business (Blackhall, 2000).
 Vinay Tiwari is a Ph.D. candidate at RSM Erasmus University. He
 received his B.Tech from IIT Kanpur, India, and his MPhil in
 Business Research (cum laude) from RSM Erasmus University, The
 Netherlands. He has previously worked in the IT industry in India.
 His work will be published in Knowledge Processes in Globally
 Distributed Contexts (Palgrave, 2008). His research interests
 include issues of communication, understanding, and culture in
 distributed work, as well as intra- and interorganizational coordi
 nation, particularly during the transition phase of outsourcing.
 Appendix A
 Protocol l^^Hlli^^^^^^^HHl^HMIHHHHHHHI^HI
 Personal Information Years in IT industry, onsite experience, offshore experience
 Educational qualification and background
 Software industry expertise or competency
 Project Characteristics Formal structure within the onsite team
 Relationship between onsite and offshore teams
 Complexity, task interdependency, novelty
 Onsite-Offshore Setup General processes involved in onsite-offshore model
 Specific Requirements Requirements development, requirements sharing, communication process, learning, problems faced, Development and instances of problems.
 Examples of interview questions:
 - Could you tell us more about instance X of requirements sharing?
 - Can you explain the requirements?
 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2/June 2008 253
This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
 Vlaar et al./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 business knowledge caused severe problems, as offshore team
 members did not understand the intention or rationale behind
 the clues offered by onsite.
 This project is strongly dependent on business
 knowledge. It is very important for the project.
 When online changes were needed, we asked [off
 shore] to conduct these changes, taking into account
 their impact on a certain type of loans. But they did
 not consider these loans and said it was not men
 tioned in the document...Itwas mentioned, but in
 business terms. (Interview with AB, Onsite)
 Moreover, it appeared that offshore team members did not
 have sufficient knowledge of particular technologies and
 programming languages. They therefore did not fully under
 stand the terminologies and technological jargon used in the
 requirements documents.
 People in Bangalore did not have expertise of that
 particular technology. They had done AS 400
 trainings or they had experience of AS 400, but they
 didn 'thave knowledge of the HP 3000 platform and
 the perspective needed for HP 3000. So, when we
 sent them the requirements document, they analyzed
 it, but for some part they analyzed it in AS 400 and
 for some part in HP 3000. Consequently, they
 couldn 't come down to the actual thing. (Interview
 with NS, Onsite)
 Experienced members at offshore generally found it easier to
 understand requirements and did not need as much communi
 cation compared to novices.
 There are very few people in the offshore team with
 more than one or one and a half years of experience
 in the project. These people usually guide the
 others. When we work on a requirement with them,
 it becomes much easier. ...We don 'thave tot ell them
 too much. (Interview with AK, Onsite)
 Offshore team members that had previously worked onsite
 brought valuable experience regarding the onsite-offshore
 setup. These members had lived in a different context and
 they had learned how the setup worked best.
 When I was in offshore, we had other people with us
 who had been at onsite for different projects. This
 helped us, because we could ask things and confirm
 our doubts with these senior people rather than
 calling or mailing onsite. (Interview with NK,
 Onsite)
 Once a person has been at the onsite of any project
 and interacted with the client, he carries the same
 perspective....Half of the time, people at offshore
 don't know what is happening, but if someone has
 been onsite and he understands the background
 behind the job, then he has a better view on what
 onsite wants. (Interview with GK, Onsite)
 Task and Requirements Characteristics
 Problems of understanding and the need for intense com
 munication not only emerged from asymmetries in knowledge
 and experience between vendor teams, but they also stemmed
 from particular requirements characteristics. Especially when
 offshore team members perceived tasks and requirements to
 be complex or ambiguous, it became more difficult for them
 to understand what was expected. Moreover, when require
 ments were unstable or continuously changing, offshore team
 members increasingly became confused and misunder
 standings arose. This sharply increased the need for com
 munication.
 / had sent a requirement offshore to make some
 changes in the code, but then the client asked to
 make other changes, which were different from the
 previous ones. When I communicated this to
 offshore, they got confused. (Interview with NK,
 Onsite)
 We received the requirements document and they
 explained to us what the aim of the exercise was [in
 a teleconference]. The first two days, they were only
 explaining the requirements. Subsequently, we
 started developing the tool. After one week, they
 asked us to change the complete logic and to present
 output in another format. There was a big slippage
 in the schedule and when we submitted, there were
 a lot of bugs. It sort of oscillated between here and
 there. (Interview with AR, Offshore)
 Additionally, when tasks were new for team members, they
 found it difficult to relate to the terminologies used, the
 information and actions required, and the constraints asso
 ciated with requirements. In contrast, when tasks were more
 common, few problems of understanding emerged and com
 munication was limited.
 They had to write a short program for a new seller.
 They did a good job. They had completed a similar
 requirement just one or two months ago, so we
 didn't have to tell them a lot. (Interview with AB,
 Onsite)
 236 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2/June 2008
 This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
 Vlaar et al./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 - How did you develop these requirements?
 - What was communicated to the offshore/onsite team?
 - How were these requirements communicated to the offshore team, and why?
 - How was the communication process between onsite and offshore?
 - Was the amount of communication sufficient; why (not)?
 - What are your views about the offshore/onsite team?
 - Did you receive deliveries on time?
 - Were you satisfied with the deliveries?
 - Do you think the offshore team understood the requirements well?
 - What problems did you face? Why do you think those problems occurred?
 - What was done to rectify the problems/errors/bugs?
 Delivery of Requirements Delivery of requirements matching expectations of onsite team
 Remarks by offshore team on onsite team, or vice versa
 Problems faced during delivery
 Overall Assessment Satisfaction of teams with results/efforts of other teams
 Lessons learned
 Appendix B
 Survey Onsite Team Members2 I^^^HH^^^H^BBHB^HBBHB^^^HBM^H
 1. How many years of experience do you have with the industry practice of your current project (such as Banking & Financial Services or
 Telecommunications etc.)?
 2. Did you attend external or internal training related to this industry practice (such as Banking & Financial Services)
 3. Are you aware of most of the concepts/words (used in your project) related to the industry practice (e.g., Escrow for BFSI)?
 4. Are your supervisor (PL/GL/PM) and client satisfied with the level of your domain knowledge?
 5. How many years of experience do you have with the programming language (such as FOCUS/RPG/JCL etc.) used in your current
 project?
 6. Have you attended external or internal training related to the programming language (such as FOCUS/RPG/JCL etc.) used in your
 project?
 7. Are you aware of most of the concepts related to the programming language used in your project (e.g., Arrays in RPG)?
 8. Are your supervisor (PL/GL/PM) and client satisfied with the level of your programming knowledge?
 9. Are you aware of most of the process-related concepts in Software Development & Maintenance (Configuration Management, Testing,
 etc.)?
 10. Are you well versed with the processes and key performance indicators of CMM (Capability Maturity Model) levels?
 11. Was it easy for you to understand the requirements when explained by the client?
 12. Could you understand the business logic behind the requirements?
 13. Could you visualize the impact of implementing the requirements on the system?
 14. Could you relate experiences from previous CRs to studying/implementing these requirements?
 15. Did you refer to insights from best practices or training while studying/implementing the requirements?
 16. Are you technically competent to understand and implement requirements?
 17. Do you regularly look at the best practices from your project and other projects?
 18. Are you aware of the expectations that the offshore team has of you concerning the requirements?
 19. Did you discuss the requirements with the offshore team until they had a good idea about the requirements?
 20. Did you share business knowledge with the offshore team to implement the requirements?
 All response categories consisted of five-point Likert-type scales.
 254 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2/June 2008
 This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
 Vlaar et al./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 Mediating Role of Communication
 Onsite and offshore team members proceeded through the
 design process by sharing their knowledge with the intention
 of bridging information gaps, preempting and mitigating
 potential misunderstandings, and at times unearthing incorrect
 assumptions held by some of the other team's members.
 Results from our first survey indicate that 15 out of 18
 informants in this study rated the extent of communication
 required for requirements delivery as being high or very high.
 Results from our second survey of 52 other members of the
 vendor company reveal that "quality of interaction" was
 perceived to be the most important factor for successful
 collaboration between onsite and offshore teams.
 Customer requirements are explained by customers
 directly to the onsite team....They will probably
 understand 90 percent of it. Then they pass it on to
 us, and we may only get 80 or 90 percent of what the
 onsite team has understood. So, overall, we get only
 70 percent of the actual requirement. We try to
 reduce this gap by communication. (Interview with
 RK, Offshore)
 Communication often assumed the form of explanations
 regarding the ultimate objectives and background of
 requirements, or the context from which they originated. In
 other cases, examples or illustrations were used to clarify
 requirements.
 Since offshore is not there during requirements
 elicitation and design, they don't have the perspec
 tive of what actually needs to be done. To pass this
 on to everybody at offshore, we have to communi
 cate and explain to them a lot. (Interview with GK,
 Offshore)
 We explain why one is doing this and that. We also
 show them what we talk about with the client and
 what the ultimate objective is of what they are doing.
 (Inteview with SK, Onsite)
 When team members perceived that their understandings were
 incomplete or different from those of their counterparts, they
 probed the other team with questions, asking for clarification.
 / used to call him [Mr. SK, Onsite] and ask him lots
 of questions. He then explained what the system
 looked like, how things were working and other
 details which were not fully related to this particular
 requirement. That helped us a lot to understand new
 requirements. (Interview with YP, Offshore)
 We go through the requirement, and if there is some
 problem of understanding, we call the person con
 cerned. First we put our understanding to them...
 and then we explain our doubts. (Interview with
 RM, Offshore)
 Team members also attempted to mutually verify one
 another's thinking by proceeding through feedback loops.
 Offshore team members continuously sought the approval of
 onsite team members to ensure that their actions were in line
 with their expectations.
 It is hard to understand everything at once. So, at
 various stages you ha ve to keep asking them whether
 your idea about the requirement is still correct.
 (Interview with SK, Offshore)
 I asked offshore to make a small change?just to add
 a Held. So, after making the change, he mails to me
 without cc-ing anyone else to please check whether
 it was wrong or right....He was a bit scared and
 wanted his work to be confirmed. (Interview with
 VM, Onsite)
 Onsite and offshore team members engaged in iterative
 patterns of interaction to increase their opportunities of
 sharing information and to make sure that erroneous assump
 tions or misunderstandings would surface during conversa
 tions. The use of a common language and templates was
 regarded as valuable for the development of better under
 standings, as becomes obvious from the following interview
 excerpts:
 Whenever they [onsite] send anything to offshore, it
 is important that they write in a programmatical [or
 technical] way, rather than a business way Even if
 we have a lot of experience at offshore, our business
 knowledge will not be equivalent to that at onsite.
 (Interview with NP, Offshore)
 It is better to follow some kind of template... .If we
 follow some template, problems of interpretation
 and pinpointing can be solved. (Interview with NP,
 Offshore)
 When some of the onsite team members found that members
 of the offshore team had inappropriate conceptions of parti
 cular requirements, they occasionally provided highly nega
 tive feedback so as to unsettle existing understandings. In
 other cases, they tried to discover why the offshore team did
 not produce what they expected.
 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2/June 2008 237
This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
 Vlaar et al./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 21. Was it easy for the offshore team to understand the requirements before any discussion with onsite?
 22. Could offshore finish the requirements within the estimated time (PDs)?
 23. Are you satisfied with the effort put in by the offshore team to understand the requirements?
 24. How was the communication between you and the offshore person in order to complete the requirements?
 25. How many bugs were reported in the review comments by the onsite team after the delivery by the offshore team?
 Appendix C
 Modules of the Finance Project IHHi^HH^BHIH^HHH^HII^^HI^^^HI^^^
 Module A The requirements for Module A came from the senior management of the client, which wanted to migrate all its application
 systems to new mainframe machines in 2 to 3 years, since support for the current machines was about to end. This required an
 analysis of processes and data flows of all running applications on the system and led to a substantial amount of analysis work
 to understand the logic of the programs, and the connections between programs. Requirements for this module mainly originated
 at the onsite team. The offshore team was asked to perform the tasks as requested by the onsite team. We analyzed two
 instances of requirements sharing, in which a requirements document was sent to offshore. Both instances included the develop
 ment of a tool by the offshore team to enable the analysis of a set of programs and to provide onsite with the files that were being
 "populated" (technical term for the process of addition or update). Tools were made for analyzing programs in the RPG (Report
 Program Generation) and FOCUS languages. The module involved two onsite and three offshore team members
 Module B Module B was created to respond to bugs and errors produced in the production system of the client. Problems were categorized
 as having Priority 1, 2 , or 3. Priority 1 refers to extremely urgent issues that need to be solved by the vendor within a period
 of 24 hours (according to the service level agreement). Priority 2 issues need to be solved by vendor within a period of 36 hours.
 Priority 3 issues were less urgent and could be solved in a period of 48 hours. Requirements in this module stemmed from the
 client's business users. In case the business users noticed any errors in the system or wanted to have new functionality, a request
 was forwarded to the onsite team, which then analyzed the requirements and decided whether the request could be solved onsite
 or needed to be forwarded to the offshore team. Two instances of requirements sharing were analyzed, in which the
 requirements document was sent to the offshore team. The requirements involved making minor changes to existing programs.
 This module had one onsite and two offshore team members.
 Module C Module C involved an application running on two separate systems, leading to redundancy. The client requested migration of
 the application to one system. This module therefore involved analysis of the programs within the application, and the relation
 between the focal application and other applications. It also included development of new programs and deletion of old
 programs that were no longer being used. The requirements were initially developed by the client's senior management. It was
 quite complicated and had a 12 month deadline from analysis to implementation. This request involved both analysis and
 development (coding of programs). We analyzed two instances of requirements sharing, in which a requirements document was
 sent offshore. This module involved three onsite team members and three offshore team members.
 Module D Module D facilitated the representation of new partners in the client's information systems. The module mainly involved the
 development of programs that were similar to the ones currently in use for partners of the client. One instance of requirements
 sharing was analyzed, which was rated as highly complex by the onsite team members. The module involved two onsite and
 two offshore team members.
 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2/June 2008 255
This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
 Vlaar et al./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 The very first delivery from offshore was a disaster
 ... .Instead of referring to production, they referred
 to development. This led to a lot of junk. So the
 result was nothing. I had to call them again and
 give them the perspective that this was not what we
 wanted. (Interview with GK, Onsite)
 They deliver, and then we see if they have done what
 we asked. If not, we talk to them and ask them why
 they did it like this. (Interview with AB, Onsite)
 In some instances, onsite team members were confronted with
 the offshore team presenting output that did not confirm to
 their expectations several times in a row. Just providing
 additional information was insufficient here, and onsite team
 members decided to offer their offshore counterparts the
 "large" or "complete" picture behind a set of requirements.
 We say to them that we want something else to be
 done. They interpret it in a different way and what
 ever they present is even worse. When we find that
 such a thing has happened, we call or mail them and
 explain the complete picture to them. (Interview
 with SK, Onsite)
 A typical problem that emerged was that members "did not
 know what they did not know" and that they "did not know
 what others did not know." In this situation, it became very
 hard to ask questions or offer explanations, as becomes
 evident from the following remarks.
 They are scared that something may be wrong, so
 they explore more and keep sending us queries to
 ask if they are on the right track. (Interview with
 NK, Onsite)
 / think offshore should have confirmed their under
 standing with us before working. If they have not
 understood even after we have explained it to them,
 they should again ask us. (Interview with AB,
 Onsite)
 The tone of interaction, the motivation to interact, and the
 language used also played a significant role, as is reflected in
 the comments by two offshore team members.
 Friendly interaction is very important. If the person
 at onsite is not responding properly, or not guiding
 us properly, for example, then it is difficult for us to
 complete the requirements too. (Interview with YP,
 Offshore)
 Language also matters. People write just like that.
 They could tell the same thing in a normal way,
 rather than blaming someone. (Interview with NK,
 Offshore)
 Congruent and Actionable Understandings
 In many instances, interviewees mentioned that acts of
 communication helped them prevent or diminish problems of
 understanding, or communicate part of their preexisting
 understandings toward offshore team members.
 Initially, the understanding of offshore is frequently
 not sufficient to carry out the requirements. We
 therefore give them certain instructions to do the
 work in a particular manner. They can't always see
 the repercussions of what will happen to the system.
 They don't have the perspective of what actually
 needs to be done, as offshore is not there when we
 receive the requirements from users or when we are
 designing how to tackle the requirement. To pass
 this on to offshore, we have to communicate and
 explain to them a lot. (Interview GK, Onsite)
 In some cases, team members maintained incorrect assump
 tions, causing problems of understanding. For instance, an
 onsite team member once falsely presumed that offshore was
 aware of the tools that were to be used to analyze production
 components.
 I asked offshore to analyze the components that were
 impacted by a certain application. When they pro
 vided me with the analysis, I was surprised. It was
 totally useless. They had done the impact analysis
 on components available in the development envi
 ronment, whereas they needed to do it on the pro
 duction environment. When we discussed, I found
 out that they were not aware of the ChangeMan tool
 that we use for production analysis. While giving
 them the requirement, I assumed that they would be
 aware of how to analyze production components. It
 turned out that these two members had actually
 never used ChangeMan before, so I had to give them
 that perspective. The final work delivered by them
 was very good. (Interview with GK, Onsite)
 In other cases, requirements were not interpreted by offshore
 in the way onsite intended.
 We received a requirement with code already pasted
 in it. Onsite meant that we should add these fields
 into the program. We thought that since the code
 was written in the requirements document, we had to
 exactly cut and paste it into the program. We did
 238 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2/June 2008
 This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
 Vlaar et al./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 not understand the actual thing. They wrote that all
 we needed to do was insert this code at the end of
 the program. This terminology was used in the mail.
 In the first part, it said that a similar kind of code
 needed to be created and that there were two to
 three code lines. All that we needed to do was insert
 these lines at the end of the program. Onsite's view
 was that we had to write similar kinds of lines but
 not exactly the same lines. However, we inserted
 those lines at the end of the code as we thought that
 the same lines as stated in the requirement document
 had to be inserted in the program. (Interview with
 NP, Offshore)
 This problem was caused by the ambiguity characterizing the
 requirement, but also by the limited use of communicative
 acts, as is reflected in the following interview fragment.
 / copy pasted the fields in the requirements
 document for them to check the order of fields, but
 they thought that what I sent needed to be copy
 pasted in the actual code. I had given them the code
 only for their understanding. But they copy-pasted
 the exact specifications I had given them, instead of
 creating new fields. The problem was caused by
 both sides. If the requirement was not clear to them,
 they should have asked for confirmation or clari
 fication. Besides, I should have made it clearer that
 I copy pasted only for illustration. (Interview AK,
 Onsite)
 Preexisting and Novel Understandings
 Communicative acts not only enabled onsite and offshore
 team members to transfer preexisting understandings, but they
 also allowed them to actively cocreate novel understandings.
 Particularly, when offshore team members developed more
 advanced understandings, they also started taking on a more
 participative role.
 In the first phase, they only know part of the entire
 project. They have a narrow idea of what has to be
 done. The picture in their mind is not clear during
 this phase. But, as the project progresses, they
 understand more and start to actively participate.
 (Interview with SK, Onsite)
 In these cases, preexisting understandings held by onsite team
 members were not only transferred to and absorbed by the
 offshore team (i.e., offshore team members' understandings
 were transformed, while onsite team members' under
 standings remained the same), but novel understandings (new
 for both parties) also emerged from the interaction between
 the parties.
 In a particular requirement, I had asked offshore to
 create a duplicate program with changes only to
 certain aspects of the program. I provided them
 with the base program and instructions on how to
 create the new program. This new program was to
 be used on a different platform than HP. When
 offshore delivered the program back to me, the
 output was not consistent with what I was expecting,
 so I communicated back to offshore that they should
 look at my instructions again and make modifica
 tions. Next day, offshore delivered the program,
 which was giving the correct output, but they also
 showed that my instructions were creating the
 problems. In our discussion, we found that my
 instructions were only appropriate if the program
 had to run on HP, but I was testing the program on
 the new platform so the output was different.
 Offshore showed that to get the correct output,
 different changes were needed if the program was to
 run on another platform. Honestly, I was not aware
 of this. I did not know that we needed different
 instructions. (Interview with GK, Onsite)
 After a while, onsite even reported and updated offshore team
 members about the discussions they had with clients. As a re
 sult, onsite and offshore team members could jointly develop
 better solutions for the issues that were brought up by clients.
 They started to rely more on each other's experience and
 knowledge, viewing problems and potential solutions from
 multiple perspectives, and cocreating new understandings.
 We have started to inform offshore about our
 communication with the client and business users
 about the business activities. This gives them a lot
 of exposure and also helps us, as they come up with
 good suggestions and solutions to issues. (Interview
 with SK, Onsite)
 Propositions on Communication and Understanding ^^H
 The case description reveals that requirements development
 is a fundamentally human-oriented and socially mediated
 process in which understandings are socially constructed (see
 also Galliers and Swan 2000). It shows that understandings
 of requirements do not exist "out there" in the minds of stake
 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2/June 2008 239
This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
 Vlaar et al./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 holders, but that they are dynamically constructed and
 negotiated during interaction processes (Bergman et al. 2002;
 Davidson 2002; Katasonov and Sakkinen 2006). Specifically,
 requirements development appears to consist of iterative
 discovery and invention cycles in which feedback on earlier
 work refines expectations and drives the evolution of under
 standings (Bigley and Roberts 2001; Wiegers 2006). During
 this process, participants expose their vision to others, while
 concurrently trying to figure out what others understand and
 want (Gioia and Chittipeddi 1991). They continuously
 exchange information in order to take into account new
 thoughts, alter perceptions, shift expectations, and eradicate
 false assumptions (Ko et al. 2005; Maitlis 2005). Speci
 fically, our analysis suggests that members of offshore ISD
 projects engage in processes of sensemaking and in
 communicative acts of sensegiving, sensedemanding, and
 sensebreaking (see Figure 1) so as to calibrate different
 thoughts and reconcile previously incompatible and possibly
 antagonistic understandings (see Gergen et al. 2001). Before
 developing propositions on the antecedents and consequences
 of these acts and processes, we first delineate their meaning.
 Sensegiving, Sensemaking, Sensedemanding,
 and Sensebreaking
 Acts of sensegiving, sensedemanding, and sensebreaking tend
 to take place in an iterative fashion (Gioia and Chittipeddi
 1991), influencing the sensemaking and meaning construction
 of others toward a new definition of reality (Gioia and
 Chittipeddi 1991; Maitlis and Lawrence 2007; Rouleau 2005;
 Weick 1995). Sensemaking involves the reciprocal inter
 action between information seeking, meaning ascription, and
 action (Gioia et al. 1994; Weick 1969). It consists of social
 construction processes that form "the primary site where
 meanings materialize," which inform and constrain action
 (Weick et al. 2005, p. 409, citing Mills 2003, p. 35) and by
 which individuals attempt to interpret and explain cues from
 their environment (Maitlis 2005). Sensemaking permits
 parties with different views and expectations to achieve
 congruency (Ring and Van de Ven 1994) and to construct
 accounts of reality that allow them to comprehend the world
 and act collectively (Maitlis 2005; Rouleau 2005; Weick and
 Roberts 1993). Sensemaking processes are activated when
 observations and expectations diverge from each other, or
 when there is no obvious way to engage in activities (Weick
 1995). Although sensemaking has mainly been associated
 with retrospection, it is also associated with anticipation and
 future-orientation (Weick 1995, 2006). Acts of sensemaking
 include, among others, observing, reasoning, analyzing,
 contemplating, anticipating and imagining. These processes
 are generally accompanied by socio-cognitive acts of sense
 giving, sensedemanding, and sensebreaking. Since these are
 easier to identify in empirical research (Gioia and Chittipeddi
 1991), we focus on the latter when analyzing the case study.
 Sensegiving consists of acts by which individuals attempt to
 alter and influence the way others think and act (Maitlis 2005;
 Weick 1995). It concerns the activities by which stakeholders
 frame and disseminate visions and beliefs to others so as to
 increase their understanding and support (Fiss and Zajac
 2006; Gioia and Chittipeddi 1991). Sensegiving may include
 offering descriptions and explanations, providing signals (Lin
 et al. 2005), constructing credible and consistent narratives,
 and projecting images through stories, slogans, metaphors,
 and artifacts (Ravasi and Schultz 2006). Gioia and Chitti
 peddi (1991, p. 443), for example, describe how the CEO of
 a large public university gave sense when he "held meetings
 explaining key initiatives, [and] disclosed intentions through
 'hypothetical scenario' presentations" in order to clarify "the
 nature of his vision, the values underlying it, and the actual
 changes that he wanted to see as a result."
 In our study, acts of sensegiving assumed several forms. In
 some instances, onsite team members purposefully translated
 business requirements in a software language that could easily
 be understood by offshore team members (see also Carlile
 2004). Consistent with findings from Orlikowski (2002), both
 parties also used standard templates and standard methods for
 conveying information. In other instances, team members
 provided explanations as to why certain requirements were
 posted and the background and rationale behind their
 requests. Team members further gave sense by confirming
 and correcting the viewpoints of others and, in line with
 earlier findings (Bechky 2003; Majchrzak et al. 2005;
 Malhotra et al. 2001), by using examples, analogies, and
 metaphors.
 Sensedemanding stems from the fact that most individuals are
 unlikely to wait for others to clarify their situation (Ramirez
 et al. 2002). Instead, they will seek to ameliorate the quality
 of the information upon which they base their decisions, and
 they will undertake strenuous efforts to acquire and process
 information so as to establish "a workable level of uncer
 tainty" and equivocality (Weick 1969, p. 40). This connotes
 with the assertion that team members whose communication
 is mediated through technologies "should resist making
 assumptions about the situation and constraints of remote
 others," and instead actively seek out such information
 (Cramton 2001, p. 368). Sensedemanding may involve, for
 example, cross-checking one's own perceptions and inter
 pretations with those of participants from another organization
 (Maitlis and Lawrence 2007) and performing inquiries or
 asking questions (Ashford et al. 2003). Such acts are evident
 240 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2/June 2008
 This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
 Vlaar et al./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 in a study by Hargadon and Bechky (2006, p. 490) on creative
 collectives (i.e., consulting firms) where individuals actively
 sought the assistance of others when they recognized or
 experienced a problematic situation. They claimed that this
 often provided new insights into problems. But sense
 demanding may surface in a myriad of subtle forms as well,
 because individuals fear being blamed for ignorance and
 failure (Ashford et al. 2003). Team members may, for
 example, attempt to gauge what is going on by asking indirect
 questions. In our study, sensedemanding assumed the form of
 team members asking their counterparts for clarification,
 requesting confirmation, and soliciting additional information.
 Sensebreaking is used to question existing understandings of
 others, causing them to experience their views of reality as
 incoherent, insensible (Lawrence and Maitlis 2007), and
 untenable. Acts of sensebreaking involve the reframing of
 previously held conceptions and redirecting other team
 members' attention and search for solutions. It makes new
 aspects of tasks and environments salient to team members,
 prompting them to view these in a new light (Hargadon and
 Bechky 2006). A focal person engages in acts of sense
 breaking when he or she believes that others hold incongruent
 or undesirable views of reality, and when he or she believes
 that other lines of thinking lead to adverse and disjointed
 action. In line with this, Lawrence and Maitlis (2007, p. 15)
 argue that sensebreaking is motivated by the need to
 problematize the understandings held by others so as to have
 them "question the bases on which they have been acting" and
 interrupt any undesirable courses of action they have taken.
 These authors advance the view that in the absence of sense
 breaking, people may continually strive to incorporate new
 knowledge into existing understandings, rather than funda
 mentally challenge the validity of preexisting understandings
 (see also Kang et al. 2007), something possibly causing
 cognitive myopia, preventing people from achieving more
 congruent understandings.
 Whereas sensemaking, sensegiving, and sensedemanding
 entail the creation of meaning (Weick 1995), sensebreaking
 involves the disruption of others' understandings (Lawrence
 and Maitlis 2007), and creating "a meaning void that must be
 filled" (Pratt 2000, p. 464). Successful sensebreaking
 practices should lead to discontentment and a drive to find
 meaning (Pratt 2000). In the context of offshore ISD, this
 means that parties use acts of sensebreaking to unsettle
 existing understandings and lines of thinking by others, which
 aligns with the idea that draft requirements should be
 presented to stakeholders as soon as possible, so as to
 "encourage criticism" (Hull et al. 2005, p. 102). In our study,
 sensebreaking took the form of team members offering their
 remote counterparts contradictory evidence, or highly nega
 tive evaluations of their work. Other attempts at sense
 breaking included the provision of an "overall" or "big"
 picture, presenting alternative views that were radically
 different from the ones that were held by the other team, and
 openly questioning assumptions.
 In summary, acts of sensegiving, sensedemanding, and
 sensebreaking constitute ongoing and dynamic processes with
 a fundamentally social character (see also Maitlis 2005; Pratt
 2000). Jointly, they enable individuals to change, synchro
 nize, and deepen their understandings.
 Antecedents of Sensegiving, Sensedemanding,
 and Sensebreaking
 Having clarified the meaning of sensegiving, sense
 demanding, and sensebreaking, we can now elaborate on the
 factors driving these acts. We focus on knowledge and
 experience asymmetries and requirements characteristics, as
 these have received most attention as determinants of
 communication and understanding in the literature (e.g., Bhat
 et al. 2006; Kijkuit and Van den Ende 2007; Ko et al. 2005;
 Lin et al. 2005; Ramirez et al. 2002). We recognize that each
 of these types of antecedents can both have a direct rela
 tionship with understanding (e.g., when individuals share an
 experience, they develop understandings without relying on
 extensive communications) and an indirect relationship with
 understanding (i.e., their effect is mediated by communicative
 acts and interaction dynamics) (Donnellon et al. 1996; see
 also Rico et al. 2008). However, as offshore ISD necessitates
 frequent adjustments and changes in team members'
 understandings, our study primarily focuses on the mediating
 effects of communication.
 When team members possess similar experience and
 comparable knowledge, communication becomes more accu
 rate and efficient (Carlson and Zmud 1999; Ngwenyama and
 Lee 1997). Synchronized knowledge bases increase the
 capacity to absorb information communicated by counterparts
 (Lane and Lubatkin 1998) and they augment the likelihood
 that actors share knowledge in common and know that they
 share it (Bechky 2003; Cramton 2001; Faraj and Sproull
 2000; Weick 1995). Furthermore, such knowledge bases
 diminish the chance that members of different teams interpret
 information in a different way (Davidson 2002), reducing
 misunderstandings (Kijkuit and Van den Ende 2007; Lin et al.
 2005). Conversely, knowledge and experience asymmetries
 arising from differences in contexts, functional and educa
 tional backgrounds, and experiences among members of
 distributed work teams (Bhat et al. 2006; Cramton 2001;
 Hinds and Bailey 2003; Katasonov and Sakkinen 2006) are
 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2/June 2008 241
This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
 Vlaar et al./Cocreating Understanding & Value in Distributed Work
 proposed to decrease the congruence and actionability of
 understandings.
 As individuals interpret a problem or situation in accordance
 with their knowledge, beliefs, and experience (Cronin and
 Weingarten 2007), knowledge and experience asymmetries
 tend to reduce the alignment of stakeholders' understandings
 of requirements (Kaiya et al. 2005; Kellogg et al. 2006; Metiu
 2006). This is supported by our survey data, which reveal
 that members of onsite and offshore vendor teams had
 different levels of experience with respect to the IT industry
 and the project itself (see Table 2). The higher these experi
 ence asymmetries were, the more the perceptions of onsite
 and offshore team members differed regarding bugs per
 module. In addition, knowledge and experience asymmetries
 have been associated with acts of communication. Ahuja and
 Galvin (2003), for example, found that asymmetries in
 knowledge and experience between newcomers and more
 experienced persons in virtual groups incited the first group
 to engage in information seeking behavior and the second
 group to exhibit information giving behavior. Generally
 speaking, our case description indicates that differences in
 knowledge and experience trigger acts of sensegiving, sense
 demanding, and sensebreaking so as to enhance the con
 gruence and actionability of understandings held by members
 of distributed work teams, as is captured in the following
 proposition (see also Figure 1).
 Proposition 1: Knowledge and experience asym
 metries among distributed workers prompt them to
 engage in acts of sensegiving, sensedemanding, and
 sensebreaking.
 A second factor affecting the development of understanding
 and communication among team members consists of task and
 requirements characteristics such as the complexity, novelty,
 ambiguity, and instability of requirements (Gorschek and
 Wohlin 2006). Studies have shown that only one-fifth of IS
 requirements can be regarded as singular or independent from
 other requirements (Dahlstedt and Persson 2006). This
 renders them complex (Campbell 1988), increasing the
 amount, intensity, and preciseness of the interaction required
 among members of different teams, and augmenting the
 extent to which individual knowledge and experience have to
 be integrated (see Baba et al. 2004; Cramton 2001).
 Similarly, the novelty of tasks and requirements has been
 shown to significantly increase communication among team
 members (Ahuja and Carley 1999) as it may render routines
 inapplicable and because it involves high levels of uncertainty
 and ambiguity (Baba et al. 2004; Kraut and Streeter 1995),
 causing team members to experience puzzling situations.
 Moreover, the instability of tasks and requirements also
 presents software developers with uncertain and ambiguous
 situations in which they have to engage in continuous inter
 action so as to elicit and recognize changes (Nuseibeh and
 Easterbrook 2000). On top of that, complex, novel, ambi
 guous, and instable tasks and requirements increase the
 likelihood that behavior and outcomes produced by team
 members do not match their counterpart's expectations (Baba
 et al. 2004). In such cases, communicative acts are used to
 reduce deviations between expectations and perceptions
 (Bhattacherjee 2001; Weick et al. 2005). We therefore
 advance that complex, novel, ambiguous, and instable tasks
 and requirements propagate socio-cognitive acts of sense
 giving, sensedemanding, and sensebreaking, as is reflected in
 our second proposition (see also Figure 1).
 Proposition 2: Complex, novel and instable tasks
 and requirements prompt distributed workers to
 engage in acts of sensegiving, sensedemanding and
 sensebreaking.
 Cocreating Value: Developing Congruent
 and Actionable Understandings
 The ultimate outcome of advanced understandings should be
 measured in terms of value creation (Sandberg and Targama
 2007). Value creation is at the heart of any organizational
 activity. Consequently, it is a central concept in the manage
 ment and organization literature. Nonetheless, there is little
 consensus on what constitutes value creation (Lepak et al.
 2007). In general, value creation has to do with the quality of
 a job, task, product, or service as perceived by users or clients
 in relation to their needs (Bowman and Ambrosini 2000). It
 concerns to the intrinsic value of product or service com
 ponents (Galunic and Rodan 1998), which may increase
 customers' or clients' willingness to pay more for an effort or
 outcome than the costs to produce it (Kang et al. 2007; Priem
 2007; Sirmon et al. 2007). Congruent and actionable under
 standings tend to increase value creation by preventing
 inappropriate information processing, reducing failure to
 interpret new cues and data, and diminishing misunder
 standings that lie at the basis of friction and conflict (Cronin
 and Weingart 2007).
 Incongruent and inactionable understandings, instead, fre
 quently cause problems of understanding (Vlaar et al. 2006)
 as they hamper interpersonal communication, which may
 cause the deterioration of relationship. Moreover, such under
 standings could render coordination precarious, increasing the
 likelihood that workers' actions contradict each other and
 that they produce outcomes that are inconsistent with other's
 242 MIS Quarterly Vol. 32 No. 2/June 2008
 This content downloaded from 
????????????137.43.139.136 on Thu, 21 Jan 2021 11:47:03 UTC????????????? 
All use subject to https://about.jstor.org/terms
